CALIFORNIA LEGACY PROJECT SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION COLORADO - MOJAVE DESERT WORKSHOP WOR KSHOP IN ANUARY V ICTORVILLE J 16 ­ 17, 2003 I NTERIM REPORT JULY 2003 PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP 1 Mary D. Nichols, Secretary for Resources Luree Stetson, Deputy Secretary for Environmental Programs Madelyn Glickfeld, Assistant Secretary for Resources, California Legacy Project
Lead Authors/Editors: Andrea Mummert ­ Conservation Programs Analyst, California Legacy Project Marc Hoshovsky ­ Senior Biologist, California Department of Fish and Game Draft Report Comments: The following individuals were instrumental in designing and managing the workshops, helping to evaluate methodology, and providing comments to initial drafts: Jeff Loux, University of California Extension, Davis Patricia McCarty, University of California Extension, Davis Carolyn Penny, University of California Extension, Davis Judy Talbot, University of California Extension, Davis Steve Blackwell, The Dangermond Group Brian Collett, The Dangermond Group Erin Klaesius, California Biodiversity Council Ann Chrisney, Riparian Habitat Joint Venture Mark Hite, California Department of Forestry and Fire Protection Dale Flowers, Dale Flowers and Associates Heather Barnett, California Legacy Project Rainer Hoenicke, California Legacy Project Charlie Casey, California Legacy Project Production Assistance: Sandra St. Louis, Resources Agency James Faria, Resources Agency
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
2
TABLE OF CONTENTS PAGE EXECUTIVE SUMMARY ...........................................................................................
Goals, Results, and Follow-up Actions..............................................................
Information Exchange...................................................................................
I. INTRODUCTION..................................................................................................
II.
SESSION RESULTS..............................................................................................
Workshop Overview.....................................................................................
Workshop Opening.......................................................................................
Presentations about Existing Regional Plans.....................................................
Regional Challenges and Opportunities............................................................
Regional Perspectives..................................................................................
Win-Win Strategies for Resource Conservation and Economic Development............
III.
INFORMATION EXCHANGE ..................................................................................
Station Results.............................................................................................
Regional Existing and Emerging Conservation Planning Efforts ............................
Regional Conservation Priorities.....................................................................
Statewide Conservation Priorities....................................................................
IV.
FINAL REPORT..................................................................................................
V. APPENDICES......................................................................................................
A) Workshop Logistics...................................................................................
B) Desert Planning Efforts..............................................................................
C) Workshop Participants..............................................................................
LIST OF TABLES Table 1.
Existing and Emerging Conservation Planning Efforts identified by workshop participants for the Colorado - Mojave region ..........................
Table 2.
Regional Conservation Priorities identified by workshop participants for the Colorado - Mojave Desert region.......................................................
Table 3.
Statewide Conservation Priorities identified by workshop participants for the Colorado - Mojave region..............................................................
LIST OF FIGURES Figure 1.
California's Desert bioregion.
Detail of the Desert Bioregion...................
Figure 2.
Locations of Existing and Emerging Conservation Planning Efforts identified by workshop participants for the Colorado - Mojave Desert region..........................................................................................
Figure 3.
Locations of Regional Conservation Priorities identified by workshop Participants for the Colorado - Mojave Desert region..............................
Figure 4.
Locations of Statewide Conservation Priorities identified by workshop Participants for the Colorado - Mojave region......................................
4 33 36 42 4 5 6 7 8 8 8 11 13 14 24 31 31 32 35 41 44 45 45 48 56
33 35 41
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
3
DESERT SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION LEGA CY
PROJECT WORKSHOP IN VICTO DRAFT INTERIM REPORT JULY 2003
RVILLE
EX
ECUTIVE SUMMARY The Desert Region Spotlight on Conservation workshop, held in Victorville on January 16 ­ 17, 2003, was the fifth in the series of nine bioregional workshops.
As shown on the maps below, this region included portions of Imperial, Inyo, Kern, Los Angeles, Riverside, San Bernadino, and San Diego counties.
The contents of this report cover: 1.
Legacy goals, workshop results, and follow-up actions 2.
A general summary of workshop highlights and events 1.
Detailed transcriptions, maps, and preliminary analysis resulting from the workshop.
The Spotlight on Conservation workshop series is based on the premise that the best way to develop a statewide conservation strategy is to engage with the varied communities throughout our state to understand the unique natural and working landscapes in each bioregion.
The California Legacy Project is holding nine bioregional workshops across the State in 2002 ­ 2003.
This will provide a better understanding of the resources highly valued in the region and the strategies for conservation investment that best fit each region.
a.
b.
Figure 1a.
California's Desert bioregion in the context of the entire state; 1b.
Detail of the Desert bioregion.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
4
The workshops were designed to accomplish the following goals: 1.
Put a spotlight on land and water conservation throughout the state; 2.
Introduce the Legacy Project to regional conservation stakeholders; 3.
Elicit information about existing regional conservation plans and priorities; monitoring, management and stewardship projects; and available data sets and; 4.
Gain a sense of the participant's high priorities for conservation including the criteria they might use for investing in conservation of various resources, and the strategies they believe most applicable to their region and interests.
GOALS, RESULTS, AND FOLLOW-UP ACTIONS In support of these goals, results and followup actions are summarized below: 1.
Spotlight conservation: A diverse group of people who work on and are affected by conservation had the opportunity to hear each other's views and to interact.
People from different parts of the region had an opportunity to share information and think about the region and the State as a whole.
To follow-up, participants can add themselves to the email list for Legacy's on-line newsletter, The Watering Hole [http://legacy.ca.gov/subscribe.epl].
Also, the Legacy Project staff distributed a participant contact list and will distribute workshop results to participants for review prior to publication.
able to highlight their valuable work in the region at display booths and in workshop sessions.
3.
Elicit information: Participants viewed maps of statewide and regional datasets (e.g. land cover types, publicly owned conservation lands, etc.) for a broad view of resources.
Legacy staff received contacts for important local datasets and access to data sharing.
Participants identified local monitoring, restoration, and stewardship projects, and conservation planning efforts.
Legacy Project staff gained a better sense of places in the region that are high conservation priorities.
For follow up, regional maps presented at the workshops and additional information received will be evaluated for inclusion in the web-based California Digital Conservation Atlas [http://legacy.ca.gov/new_atlas.epl].
Sharing this information with state agencies will enable them to consider existing local and regional plans and recommended regional priorities when determining statewide priorities for investment.
Gain insight on regional perspectives: In break-out groups, participants were asked to identify regional planning needs; ways in which the State could provide support to regional conservation; and the greatest needs or next steps for implementing existing plans.
Gain insight on regional conservation investment strategies: In break-out groups, participants were asked to identify regional conservation priorities and specific strategies that can offer mutual benefit to conservation and local economies.
For follow-up, Legacy staff will review differences in sub-regional and region-to ­region strategies and will attempt to determine how these differences can be taken into account in developing conservation investment strategies at the state level.
2.
Introduce the Legacy Project: Participants had the opportunity to ask substantial and challenging questions about the Legacy Project.
They appreciated the interest expressed regarding their views about State conservation investment strategies.
Resource Agency departments were also
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
5
INFORMATION EXCHANGE One of the key components of the workshop is an "Information Exchange" gallery where participants share detailed knowledge of the area's conservation efforts and their regional and statewide conservation priorities.
It is set up as an open house of interactive stations focused on specific conservation-related questions.
Here are the results of the six stations.
1.
Data available and data needs: Participants viewed Legacy's existing regional and statewide maps depicting natural resources datasets, and land ownership and land use boundaries.
Data available will help inform the regional and local database survey and will be added to California Environmental Resources Evaluation System (CERES) [http://ceres.ca.gov].
Existing and emerging conservation planning efforts: Of the 21 on-going conservation planning efforts, nearly half were identified as addressing more than one resource type.
Conservation of Aquatic Biodiversity or water resources was cited as an important goal for eight of the 21 programs (38%).
Four of the plans focus on military installations.
Rare or sensitive species are noted as the primary focus of three of the plans.
This input will be complied into regional maps of existing and emerging conservation plans and areas of conservation interest.
These maps will be evaluated before possible inclusion in the web-based Conservation Atlas.
Regional conservation priorities: Of the 80 locations identified, the Salton Sea was given the greatest amount of attention (receiving more dots than any other location).
Many of the other chosen areas centered on habitat linkages, riparian areas, endangered species habitat, and areas threatened by development.
Additional notable areas included the Amaragosa River, wildlife corridors adjacent to Joshua Tree National Park, and dune habitats in Imperial County.
Statewide conservation priorities: The majority of places identified as statewide priorities were located between Los Angeles and San Diego, in the South Coast region.
Clusters of priority sites centered around the San Gabriel Mountains, the Santa Clara River headwaters, the city of San Diego, and the Amargosa River.
On a statewide basis, habitat linkages; threatened, endangered and sensitive species' protection; management of water resources; and agricultural concerns were repeatedly cited as important concerns.
In summary, through the Spotlight on Conservation Workshop series, the California Legacy Project is trying to combine input from state departments, boards and conservancies as well as local government and private stakeholders in developing a statewide conservation investment strategy.
This workshop has specifically allowed the Resources Agency to learn about important local and regional values, data, plans, and priorities in the Desert Bioregion.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
6
I. INTRODUCTION This Interim Report is a summary of the California Legacy Project Spotlight on Conservation workshop held in Victorville for the Desert bioregion.
This workshop was the fifth in a series of nine workshops to be held throughout the State in 2002-2003.
Participating counties included Imperial, Inyo, Kern, Los Angeles, Riverside, San Bernadino, and San Diego.
The Interim Report is a record of the workshop results and provides some preliminary analysis.
In an effort to develop California's first­ever statewide resources conservation strategy, " he California Legacy Project will assist everyone who knows the land and is working to save it.
We're making an unprecedented effort to reach out to those who care about the future of California's natural resources.
I invite you to get involved in this exciting effort to work with us on the state-of-the-art tools and conservation strategies that will help protect and restore California's natural resources and working landscapes."
the California Legacy Project is working with Resources Agency state departments, boards, commissions and conservancies, CALEPA departments, the California Department of Food and Agriculture, the Governor's Office of Planning and Research, and federal and nonprofit conservation partners.
The Project seeks the input of stakeholders affected by conservation investment, as well as of advocates for conservation investment.
The Legacy Project will create analytical tools that can help state and federal agencies; local and regional governments; and public and private groups assess resource values and risks, and conservation opportunities for large landscape areas in each of the state's major bioregions.
Such evaluations guide decisionmakers to more effective and strategic allocations of funds.
The California Legacy Project includes a wide range of perspectives and incorporates agency and public participation at all levels of its work.
It builds on existing data and conservation efforts, facilitating partnerships in data improvement and conservation actions.
Working together with a host of partners, the Project helps to ensure a legacy of natural resources and working landscapes for California's future.
T
-Mary D. Nichols Secretary for Resources
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
7
II.
SESSION RESULTS WORKSHOP OVERVIEW Eighty-seven people attended the workshop.
All workshop invitees are recommended to Legacy staff as being knowledgeable about and interested in regional conservation and natural resource issues.
In extending invitations, we attempt to be thorough and to include a broad spectrum of viewpoints and expertise, but we recognize that our participant groups ultimately represent a relatively small, self-selected, focus group.
Thus, we recognize that the recorded responses are not representative of the public, or even of natural resources professionals as a whole.
The workshop is designed for one and a half days and has two distinct, but equally important, components: (1) a series of facilitated discussions in large and small groups, and (2) an "Information Exchange," set up in an open house format, where participants view and react to an extensive gallery of maps and data and provide Legacy with detailed information on conservation-related questions.
Day One begins with a welcome, a presentation about the Legacy Project, and a presentation about current, large-scale, planning efforts in the region that is intended to set the context for follow-up conversations.
Participants then discuss regional conservation issues in a facilitated large group session.
Day One ends with a 2-hour opportunity to engage in the "Information Exchange" and provide detailed input.
Day Two begins with small break-out group discussions.
At previous "Spotlight on Conservation" workshops, participants discussed the types of criteria they would use in deciding how and where to invest in conservation.
However, given the extent of large-scale conservation planning that has already taken place in the desert bioregion1, a criteria-generating exercise was deemed unnecessary.
Instead, participants discussed regional perspectives on conservation planning progress and needs.
In the afternoon, following a brief presentation on the California Digital Conservation Atlas, participants convene in small groups for discussions of strategies that offer mutual benefit to local economic objectives as well as resource conservation.
Participants then return to large group for reports back on the results of the small groups sessions.
Finally, the workshop closes with a summary of workshop highlights and with a closing address by a Resources Agency official.
For a detailed Workshop Agenda see Appendix A. WORKSHOP OPENING To open the workshop, Ron Rempel, Deputy Director, Habitat Conservation Division, California Department of Fish and Game, welcomed participants.
Rempel noted the effort being made by the Legacy project to reach out to landowners, conservation organizations, business interests, and government agencies.
He also commended the Legacy Project's scope, including not only biodiversity, but also rural recreation opportunities and working landscapes, as well as the broad range of conservation tools the project supports, including not only acquisition, but also private land stewardship and restoration.
In particular, he acknowledged the importance of stewardship incentive programs and recognized the value of working lands not only as habitat and open space, but also as they support regional heritage and economy.
He recognized the tremendous amount of effort that has already gone into large-scale conservation plans in the Desert region.
Acknowledging that the plans balance many competing interests and that there are some disagreements over that balance, Rempel explained that the Legacy Project hoped to focus on the positive investments the State could make to move forward the actions on which there is consensus and to achieve the key steps that need to be taken to reach long-term goals.
Following Ron Rempel's remarks, David Widell, Deputy Director, Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Recreation Division, CA Department
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
8
of Parks and Recreation, spoke about the Division's work in the desert region.
He noted that many Resources Agency and Legacy Project goals, including developing collaborative partnerships, working to identify priority areas, and building on local efforts, have proven important for on-the-ground projects.
As an example of what can be done to balance off road recreational demand and species' protection, he described the Western Riverside Partnership between the Off Highway Division of State Parks and the
Department of Fish and Game.
State Parks will develop an Off Highway Vehicle park on land that it has held for some time.
In return for developing that park, it will protect (at a 6 to 1 ratio) habitat for rare species that is now being used illegally for off road vehicle activity.
In conclusion, Widell observed that with increasing population pressure (and Offhighway vehicle opportunity demands), it becomes more important to have accurate assessments, good data, and strong partnerships.
1.
A map showing boundaries of and presentations describing Large-Scale Regional Plans for the Desert Bioregion are included in the next section.
Additionally, criteria, issues, and goals that have guided several of these formal planning processes are summarized in Appendix B.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
9
LARGE-SCALE REGIONAL PLANS FOR THE DESERT BIOREGION
The map below shows areas covered by the following planning documents: 1.
Coachella Valley Multiple Species Habitat Conservation Plan (www.cvmshcp.org) 2.
West Mojave Plan, A Habitat Conservation Plan and California Desert Conservation Area Plan Amendment (http://www.ca.blm.gov/cdd/landuseplanning.html) 3.
Northern and Eastern Colorado Desert Coordinated Management Plan and Final Environmental Impact Statement (http://www.ca.blm.gov/cdd/landuseplanning.html) 4.
Lower Colorado River Multi-Species Conservation Program Habitat Conservation Plan (http://www.lcrmscp.org) 5.
Proposed Northern and Eastern Mojave Coordinated Management Plan and Final Environmental Impact Statement (http://www.ca.blm.gov/cdd/landuseplanning.html)
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
10
PRESENTATIONS ON THREE LARGE-SCALE PLANNING EFFORTS: Bill Havert, Executive Director of the Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy presented the following information on the Coachella Valley Multiple Species Habitat Conservation Plan (Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy and Coachella Valley Association of Governments): The purpose and goals of plan are: - - - - - - - -
Address Federal Endangered Species Act and California Endangered Species Act issues proactively.
Provide for the conservation of and secures incidental take permits for 27 species of plants and animals.
Provide for the conservation of 27 natural communities.
Conserve terrestrial and aquatic biodiversity resources Protect watershed values as important ecological processes Include a public access and recreation component Protect natural open space in and around urban areas Does not address working landscapes (grazing and timber aren't-issues; agriculture is generally unaffected)
Plan Participants: -
- -
Signatories to the Plan will include cities, the County of Riverside, special districts, Caltrans, California Department of Fish and Game, Bureau of Land Management, National Park Service, U.S. Forest Service, U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service, and possibly California Department of Parks and Recreation A Scientific Advisory Committee designed the proposed Reserve System based on biology.
Stakeholders served as a Project Advisory Committee
Status and Time Frame: - - - -
An Internal Review Draft was released in September 2002.
Meetings with California Department of Fish and Game and U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service are in progress (as of January 2003) to iron out details.
Public Review Draft and Environmental Impact Report and Impact Statement will be out in the Spring of 2003.
Plan adoption and permit issuance are to be complete by the end of 2003.
Lessons Learned: - - - - - -
Multiple Species Habitat Conservation Plans are very complex take longer than expected.
Leave the science to the scientists.
Provide a vehicle for the other stakeholders to participate.
Be comprehensive.
GIS support is invaluable.
More guidance from California Department of Fish and Game and U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service throughout the process would be helpful.
Bill Haigh, Project Manager, West Mojave Plan, Desert District, Bureau of Land Management presented the following information on the Draft Environmental Impact Report and Statement for the West Mojave Plan, A Habitat Conservation Plan and California Desert Conservation Area Plan Amendment (U.S. Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management): The West Mojave Plan is a Multi-Species Habitat Conservation Plan (the largest in the U.S.) and Federal Plan Amendment.
75 Federal Conservation Programs are incorporated in the plan.
The Planning area is adjacent to 24 million people and includes: - -
123 plant and animal species, 42 of which are proposed for permit coverage A total of 9.3 Million Acres (owned by Bureau of Land Management, Department of Defense, State, and Private)
Creation of the Plan was a collaborative, public process, including the following participants: - -
"Supergroup" composed of 28 agencies and jurisdictions, 120 Non-Governmental Organizations, and Individuals Steering Committee; Planning Team; Task Groups and Subcommittees
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
11
West Mojave Plan Continued: Time Frame: Planning Process Began 1992 1997-2001: Field Data Collection 1998-1999: Biologists Evaluate Current Management 2000-2002: Supergroup Writes Plan; Final Scoping Meetings: June 2002 Final Plan and EIR/S: September 2003; Federal Decision: December 2003; State and Local Decision: 2004 Issues addressed by the plan are:Streamline Endangered Species Act Compliance - Endangered and Sensitive Species Conservation and Recovery (species of concern include Lane Mountain Milk Vetch) - Permit Delays and Expense - Fort Irwin Expansion - Motorized vehicle access - Grazing - - - - -
Process for establishing a motorized vehicle access network: -
Field Survey of 8,000 Miles of Routes; designated Open and Closed Routes (by applying a Decision Tree, with detailed review of maps with public, task group and subcommittee participation) Habitat Loss and Deterioration; Disease; Human Activities; Predation Habitat Conservation Area; Limitation of 1% Ground Disturbance in Habitat Conservation Plan; Habitat Restoration Credits; Education
Threats include: - -
Conservation strategies included:
Dick Crowe, Resource Management Specialist, Desert District, Bureau of Land Management, presented the following information on the Proposed Northern and Eastern Colorado Desert Coordinated Management Plan and Final Environmental Impact Statement (U.S. Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management): Major Plan Scoping Issues/ Proposals include: - Tortoise Recovery - Establish large recovery units, called Desert Wildlife Management Areas (DWMAs) and - -
- - -
designate as Areas of Critical Environmental Concern.
Enact 1% surface disturbance limitation on Federal lands (not including grazing, fire, light disturbance).
Bighorn Sheep - Meta-population management via 2 Wildlife Habitat Management Areas (WHMA).
Focus on mitigation and maintenance of connectivity.
Review maintenance of artificial drinkers in wilderness areas.
Other Species - Establish multi-species WHMAs for total of 60 special status species and their habitats to cover 80% of species ranges.
WHMA location criteria: 1) excludes high value uses areas, 2) provides connectivity to restricted areas and DWMAs, 3) choose areas where the most species occur in the least area.
Wild Burros ­ Establish 2 Habitat Management Areas on Colorado River, reduce some management areas.
Routes Designation - Inventory all routes, considering species proximity and redundancy.
95% of roads proposed to remain open, 5% closed.
Close 5- - 75% of driveable washes in Desert Wildlife Management Areas.
Land Tenure Adjustment ­ Acquire lands within and dispose of federal lands outside DWMAs/ WHMAs.
Rationale for Proposed Plan - Desert Wildlife Management Areas (DWMAs) ­ The large size (50% larger than minimum Desert Tortoise Recovery Plan recommended) should reduce effects of allowed uses.
- - -
Cattle Grazing - perennial grazing continues based on science review, but ephemeral grazing is eliminated and forage priority is given to tortoise.
Routes, Washes, Vehicle Events, OHV Open Areas, Burros - agreement among collaborators.
Land Tenure Adjustment - approach would be win-win for Federal Lands management and private uses if can accomplish through land exchange.
Approved Plan -
The Approved Plan will be published for public distribution once the other California Desert Plan Amendment Plans have been completed and all plans have been reviewed for consistency.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
12
REGIONAL CHALLENGES AND OPPORTUNITIES As part of the first day of the workshop, participants were challenged to identify some of the most pressing issues for conservation in Desert region including unique regional opportunities and challenges.
Participants detailed a host of regional challenges including: striking a balance between recreation and conservation, population growth and increasing pressures on air quality and water resources, and needs for sound stewardship.
Opportunities to improve upon these conditions were also presented, many of which centered on partnerships for planning, management, and OPPORTUNITIES Use desert advisory groups Smart growth in urban areas e.g. Riverside County process Volunteer help, Non-Governmental Organizations (NGO's) and academics Compliance through education; provide interpretive information on the desert and disseminate information better Better outreach and communication to local communities Inform public about the diversity of interests trying to protect desert Provide visitors with positive experience Communicate focus on tourism Expand recreation opportunities in west Mojave State lands commission has scattered parcels to exchange Economic partnerships for projects Joint ventures program for funding and cooperation Desert manager group forum Communication between agencies and planning groups Opportunities for partnering because many group have common interest Existing good management by private owners Department of Defense (DOD) is authorized to use funds for land stewardship outside the actual boundaries of the military facility Data clearinghouse for information exchange 5 year moratorium amendment after memo completion It is positive when stakeholders take on the role of stewardship Continue the National Park Service Advisory Group beyond 2004 to advise on desert planning issues Wild and scenic rivers opportunity
funding, as well as on education and engagement of the public and of recreation users.
The following are the lists of the opportunities and challenges identified by the participants at the Colorado - Mojave Desert Workshop.
These are not intended to be exhaustive lists of possible opportunities and constraints; rather, these lists document the ideas that were foremost in participants' minds at the start of the workshop.
Bold print denotes those items that seemed especially unique to the Desert Bioregion.
ISSUES AND CHALLENGES Population growth and border impacts from Nevada and Mexico Long-term water use Water resource extraction to urban areas Coordination of efforts and sharing resource Resource users from the outside area need to learn stewardship ethic Better law enforcement Information sharing (planners, agencies, academics) Concern for impacts to cultural and historical resources Funding to carry out commitments (including cost of labor to do plans) Staging and access for recreation Concern over loss of local control over land use; need to bring cities into decisions Concern over the very high ratio of public to private land in the region Recreation and reduced habitat vs. special status State Parks Dispute resolution processes needed Climate change Liabilities for abandoned mines 
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
13
SMA
LL
G
ROUP SESSION:
REG
IONAL
PERSPECTIVES In thinking about these questions, participants were asked to consider the following resource themes: · ·
The task of the first small group session was to discuss regional perspectives.
Participants were divided into five small groups by subregion: North and East Mojave, West Mojave, Coachella Valley, Northeast Colorado, and West Colorado.
The group discussions were guided by the following three questions: 1.
What additional natural resource, working landscape and recreational planning efforts are needed in the region? 2.
How can the state provide additional support to ongoing conservation efforts and the provision of recreational opportunities in the region? E.g. partnering, supporting studies, assisting with data development, etc. 3.
What are the greatest needs or next steps for implementing exiting plans or priorities?
Terrestrial Biodiversity Aquatic Biodiversity Working Landscapes Urban Open Space Rural Recreational Opportunities
· · ·
The following workshop notes reflect the opinions of individual participants, focused on the sub-region addressed by each group.
They do not represent the results of a group consensus process, nor even necessarily the perspective of the majority of participants.
_________________________________________________________________________________________________________
1.
REGIONAL PERSPECTIVES FROM NORTH AND EAST MOJAVE GROUP
A. Needs for additional natural resource, working landscape and recreational planning efforts: 1.
Public Land Access - Equestrian (Mojave Road/ Highway 95) - Larger trail head facilities - Equestrian trails in City General Management Plans - Off-highway vehicle (OHV)/ Equestrian/ Mountain biker interactions need to be resolved - Land access: hunting, mining, hiking - Vehicular access to back country events 2.
Ground Water Management and Coordination, inter-agency/ inter-state (with Nevada) - Yucca Mountains Nuclear Waste Depository Concerns 3.
Amargosa River: lack of comprehensive planning for water, habitat, and endangered species' protection - Encourage local planning and local input (appropriate hearing times and places) 4.
Public Health Concerns on public lands - At springs, restroom facilities - Off-highway vehicles: air quality impacts, collision potential for hikers, equestrians - Lack of Soil Survey Information, digitized 5.
Equestrian/ Back Country Permit Access
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
14
NORTH AND EAST MOJAVE CONTINUED
6.
Permit streamlining for restoration
7.
Long Range Interpretive Plan for Mojave/ Desert Region - Cultural inventory and tourism opportunities; Regional tourism plan - How to address external threats (Noise from airports, Urban encroachment) - Lack of coordinated planning for metal mining between state and federal government 8.
Excessive planning and resource restrictions (water, etc.) on local scale - Lack of opportunity for public to participate in planning meetings (hearing times/ places) - Off-highway vehicle site plans should include: a.
More rural community input b. Urban and rural planning processes c. Consider Coordinated Resource Management Plans (CRMPs), State funding, Resource Conservation Districts (RCD's)
9.
Regional Economic Planning: conservation, preservation and economic activity B. Support to ongoing conservation efforts and the provision of recreational opportunities that could be provided by the State: 1.
Regional Economic Plan - For tourism, employment, interpretation/ education, data gathering, business, economic activity, military/ Department of Defense - An example is Inyo Co.
General Management Plan ("Inyo 2020") - North and East Mojave Planning Effort areas are rural, low density, without a central economic or tax base 2.
Inter-state planning (between California and Nevada) - Aquatic resources Caltrans/ Department of Fish and Game.
- State funding for General Management Plans; evaluate economics - State coordinator/ clearinghouse for sustainable tourism/ ecotourism - State/ county coordination on existing roads, rural transportation , and regional transportation planning - Increase State role in Federal/ State planning efforts: Serve as middle-man; Coordinate with federal agency "state office" (e.g. Bureau of Land Management LA Office); Address gaps in planning - Continue and increase support /funding grants for local efforts ­ parks - Increase State advocacy role in Yucca mountains project C. Greatest needs and next steps for implementing existing plans and priorities 1.
Lower Owens River Project (LORP) - Owens River and Habitat, Owens Lake - Education, interpretation, and outreach about aquatic habitats - Recreation component - Eradication of invasive species 2.
North and East Mojave Planning Effort ­ Access to the planning effort by citizens - General lack of transportation plans - Truck traffic on 395 - 20% of plans being implemented due to lack of funds - Fund matching/ seed money for local project grants
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
15
2.
REGIONAL PERSPECTIVES FROM WEST MOJAVE
A. Needs for additional natural resource, working landscape and recreational planning efforts: 1.
2.
3.
4.
5.
6.
More planning efforts needed for Mojave River (watershed plan) Exotic species, overdraft Rail transportation corridor planning along Eastern Sierra Subsurface flows; washes as sensitive areas; consistent plans across government jurisdictions Riparian Habitat Joint Venture needed for Mojave River, specific entity/ structure for implementation Wildlife migration-linkage protection for tortoise and bighorn sheep - Along washes and stream courses - Resolve jurisdictional issues - Address human-wildlife interaction Mojave River planning participation incentives needed for cities, water districts, Mojave River Tie planning and implementation into education efforts Transition zone between mountains and desert (San Andreas Rift Zone)
7.
8.
9.
B. Support to ongoing conservation efforts and the provision of recreational opportunities that could be provided by the State (State support in funding partnerships, data development, etc.): 1.
Need for funding and expertise for wetlands restoration/ creation (compensation), especially for Harper Lake 2.
State Off-highway vehicle park needs support, management, and enforcement coordinated with West Mojave Plan 3. Use water use, recharge, water "mining"/ overdraft issues as examples for data development 4.
Evaluation of water resources, especially on Harper Lake 5.
Pay more attention to the desert.
Consider natural resources independent of population voting power 6.
Fill jurisdictional gap in ecological transition zone (San Andreas Rift Zone) 7.
Need transportation corridor funding for East Sierra 8.
Evaluate micro and macro wildlife linkages; fill gaps in linkages 9.
Address human­wildlife interface issues (traditional life styles; recreation access and type of use ­ incorporate historic uses) 10.
State should take proactive role in multiple-use resolution between Off-highway vehicles, equestrians, etc.
(Should establish Red Rock-type parks) 11.
Need comprehensive soil survey for desert in digital format to fill Natural Resources Conservation Service gaps 12.
Work on Urban Open Space definition 13.
State Urban Design guidelines 14.
Urban parks need to be different in desert than elsewhere 15.
"River Greenways" ­potential involvement by Mountains Restoration and Conservation Authority 16.
Educate landowners about water use: appropriate desert landscaping; provide funding for conservation education 17.
Open space management issues are difficult for local government, there should be more state conservancy involvement
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
16
WEST MOJAVE CONTINUED
18.
19.
20.
21.
22.
23.
24.
25.
26.
27.
28.
29.
More funding for open space acquisition (consistency and assurance) Conflicting state mandates need to be resolved regarding open space development Facilitate re-evaluation of payment in lieu of taxes State needs to consider conservation implementation effects on military installation State housing requirements need to be expanded to include environmental conservation elements Increase support for education (K-12, adults/ tourists) in lower Owens Valley Buffer/ conservation lands partnership with Department of Defense around military bases Need state coordinator in desert manager group State involvement in looking at differences between South and North side of mountains; "One size does not fit all" in terms of land use Transportation safety needs to be redefined (e.g. 55 mph on dirt roads) Establish "safe" corridors for human development, where there is no interference with wildlife Work on fire and fuel management in forest and transition/ interface zone
C. Greatest needs and next steps for implementing existing plans and priorities: 1.
Harper Lake (within adjudicated groundwater basin) wetland restoration 2.
Fremont peak: Off-highway vehicle extensive existing trail network; proposed partnership for state Off-highway vehicle park with Bureau of Land Management, Catellus, and other private landowners 3.
Mojave River State Park 4.
River/ wash greenway acquisitions (for open space) by State conservancies 5.
New State conservancy for the desert area; 6.
consider tax issues as part of land acquisition/ easements 7.
Payments in lieu of taxes are not enough; evaluate new formula, off set decreased tax revenue; 8.
State "Nexus," to serve as a point of coordination.
Department needed to balance funding between people who designate plans and those who implement Western Mojave Key Points I. II.
III.
IV.
V. VI. VII.
Mojave River Harper Lake Mountain/ Desert Transition Zone Tax Issues Open Space Human Wildlife interface (Off-highway vehicles, lifestyles, impacts to and by wildlife) Military Bases
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
17
3.
REGIONAL PERSPECTIVES FROM COACHELLA VALLEY
A. Needs for additional natural resource, working landscape and recreational planning efforts: 1.
Notification for property owners if their land may be affected by the Habitat Conservation Plan 2.
Maintenance and monitoring plans and funding for purchased lands 3.
Regionwide 1601/ US Army Corp of Engineers 404 permit for streambed restoration - Streamline this permit process, especially in coordination with Habitat conservation Plan B. Support to ongoing conservation efforts and the provision of recreational opportunities that could be provided by the State (State support in funding partnerships, data development, etc.): 1.
Data on impact of non-motorized trails and effect on peninsular Bighorn Sheep 2.
Legacy [Resources Agency] should help with further inter-agency cooperation 3.
Legacy [Resources Agency] should support agencies (politically or with data) when they make tough decisions favorable to protection habitat/ species, rather than favorable to people 4.
Provide guidance in Natural Communities Conservation Plan process from the beginning (a manual available at the very beginning)2 5.
Additional training should be provided to California Fish and Game personnel for planning processes; There should be an accelerated Department of Fish and Game response time where decisions are needed.
6.
Agencies should streamline their decision-making processes and make them more transparent, so that private landowners can be more involved 7.
Streamlining of State processes for decision making and permitting for private lands 8.
More data sharing is needed between all parties as well as stakeholders 9.
State should supply an ombudsman to facilitate actions desired by local or private landowners 10.
Assistance in allowing landowners to preserve habitat in the long-term 11.
Provide for partnerships between private and public owners on stewarding common resources.
Establish standards (that are supported by sound science) that define healthy ecosystems and healthy resources to help private landowners maintain resources 12.
Plans should address any conflicts between resource protection and fire hazard mitigation for private property 13.
Establish standards for actions that are known to improve habitat 14.
Some private landowner representatives thought government landowners should be required to maintain current lands to healthy standards before acquiring more habitat 15.
The State needs better science on the impacts of grazing (looking at both benefits and potential impacts) in the desert 16.
The State needs to support monitoring to be aware of the conditions of all ecosystems C. Greatest needs and next steps 1.
Be willing to utilize science Science) 2.
Look at original sources of accurate and supported by 2.
for implementing existing plans and priorities: that is balanced and unbiased (like National Academy of information and ensure that the baseline is scientifically data not guesses
The California Department of Fish and Game is currently creating a guidance manual for Natural Community Conservation Plans (NCCPs).
Presently, three chapters of the forthcoming manual are complete and available online.
These are "Roles and Responsibilities of Consultants in Developing NCCP/HCPs," "Improving Public Outreach and Education for Natural Community Conservation Planning," and "Guidance for the NCCP Science Advisory Process," available at www.ca.dfg.gov/nccp.
(Additional guidance documents on this website pertain to the former NCCP Act and are not intended to serve as guidance for the current NCCP Act, but are provided for information only.)
In addition to these documents, guidance as to what should go into a plan can be found within the NCCP Act itself.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
18
COACHELLA VALLEY CONTINUED
3.
For efforts to establish Statewide GIS data standards, incentives are needed to get and share the data 4.
For all Plans, the maintenance plans need to be coordinated with adjacent landowners 5.
Assuring funding for maintenance Other Issues and Concerns Legacy should be aware that public input (such as from this workshop) often reflects widely divergent viewpoints, and should be cautious about using any individual's comments as support or justification for action.
Government needs to be accountable; government needs to share liability when they hold up action.
There should be an incentive to act now, such as an automatic issuance of permit after X number of days, or some other penalty Government needs to become actively aware of the perception that private landowners are much more restricted than government Government needs to become actively aware of and to address the double standard regarding what government and private landowners can do in protected areas Government should maintain resources if habitat restoration unduly restricts landowners Rethink government acquisition of lands in this region where so much land is already publicly owned ____________________________________________________________________________ 3.
REGIONAL PERSPECTIVES FROM NORTHEAST COLORADO DESERT
A. Needs for additional natural resource, working landscape and recreational planning efforts: 1.
Consider Department of Defense lands in State and Federal plans - Chocolate Mountains, Yuma 2.
Lower Northeast Colorado plans are not well integrated with other resources and plans.
Need one larger regional plan.
Show how plans interface.
- Park unit plans, Coachella Valley, Lower Colorado River Plan, North East Colorado, Metropolitan Water District - Imperial Irrigation District, Salton Sea and lower Colorado River - Enacting one plan may negatively affect others 3.
No group like Desert Managers Group for lower Colorado - Desert Managers Group is addressing some lower Colorado issues.
- Others can join Desert Managers Group.
- Desert Managers Group not focused on all topics; for example, Salton Sea not addressed.
They could add representation from Riverside, Imperial County, etc. to Desert Managers Group, Resource Conservation District, and Resource Conservation and Development District - Desert Managers Group Charter limited to public land managers - There should be subgroups focused on topics, rather than on areas; could have public land manager bring up more issues - Aquatic biodiversity is not adequately addressed in the North East Colorado, Salton Sea, or Colorado River Plans.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
19
NORTHEAST COLORADO CONTINUED
4.
5.
6.
7.
8.
The Plans (North East Colorado and Salton Sea) needs to mesh with Colorado River Plan to address corridors etc. that cross plan lines.
- There are discrepancies and conflicts between plans.
Resource Conservation and Development Districts should continue actively coordinating the New River Plan in part through agriculture plans in Imperial Valley.
Sewer issue from Mexicali county is being partially addressed, but needs more funding to expand planning to address river water quality.
County needs support from state and federal government for wetlands/ water quality project.
Government agencies need to address water transfer effects on air quality, wetlands for water quality, and other issues.
Government agencies should be more active in protecting grazing lands.
Government agencies should consider local economies and the impacts that come with regulation and conservation investment.
-
B. Support to ongoing conservation efforts and the provision of recreational opportunities that could be provided by the State 1.
Keeping Department of Defense lands/ activities viable 2.
Department of Parks and Recreation director can designate areas in parks as gem and mineral collection areas - Additional recreation opportunities - Rockhounds donate time, etc. - Also brings money to local communities - For example: Collecting Termaline in Anza-Borrego is not allowed, but Department of Parks and Recreation could establish limits to the amount that is collected.
3.
Wilderness designation is an issue - allows lower management costs.
4.
State could partner more with Resource Conservation and Development Districts - Low state representation - Could help coordinate efforts - Knowledge, funding - Help bring projects together 4.
Create border coalition: address issues on both sides of U.S. Mexico border.
Resource Conservation and Development Districts got together on the U.S. side of the border; if the State would get involved, there could be more partnership opportunities to pull in more funding in from the federal government, etc. 5.
There should be State representation on Resource Conservation and Development District council, to have an ear and recognize opportunities.
Could be one of several agencies such Technology, Trade and Commerce Agency 6.
Help address truck traffic, water sewer issues, power plants in Mexico.
Federal government is not mitigating; the State needs to be more active in making the Federal government more aware of the issues and encourage the federal government to address them.
7.
Provide funding C. Greatest needs and next steps for implementing existing plans and priorities: 1.
Senate Bill 1468: counties and local government to consider Department of Defense lands in planning.
Federally funded Resources Agency should ask their departments to run planning by Department of Defense, too.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
20
NORTHEAST COLORADO CONTINUED
2.
Department of Defense land's missions are not for conservation.
Want to roll back some restrictions in cases where Department of Defense's mission conflicts with Endangered Species Act.
3.
Integrated Natural Resources Management Plan can be used to substitute for to critical habitat.
(This is a Department of Defense/ Department of Interior issue,) - Need guidance for when to trigger state involvement with Department of Defense - It is not practical to use one simple rule (like 20 mi. zone); need to make info about military flights and officials impact zones (like noise) more available to other planners 4. Use farming buffers as opposed to housing next to military bases 5.
Consider impacts of flight paths/ routes etc.; especially low level training routes; look at noise studies 6.
More research is needed from Interstate 10 north to Interstate 40 and in Riverside County.
Department of Fish and Game needs more resources.
- Fairy duster and other plant species, Bighorn sheep - Better information on Desert Tortoise and the Andrew's dune scarab beetle; there is some misinformation out there; make sure data based on good science 7.
There should be a centralized way to make data available to all parties 8.
Natural Diversity Data Base should be more accessible to the public and needs to be updated 9.
In the Northeast Colorado plan everything gets mitigation, but at the expense of recreation.
Smaller Off-highway vehicle areas lead to higher impacts.
10.
Need to identify new Off highway-vehicle park areas 11.
Look at middle ground of recreation.
Family cars and bicycles are Off Highway Vehicles as well and when restrictions are placed on Off Highway Vehicle use, they are being restricted as well.
In the debate between environmentalists and dune buggie/dirt bike users, the interests of the bicyclist and passive recreationist gets left out.
6.
Grazing has benefits (aesthetic) that should be considered, especially in Coachella 7.
Redefine some wilderness areas so they can be opened up to some other uses 8.
Sometimes staff and agencies have information that they are discouraged from sharing.
9.
Implement Off-highway vehicle studies that show the need for more OHV areas 10.
Funding to manage State school bond lands and other lands, illegal dumping, county pick-up management costs, etc. 11.
Keep working lands working; non-profits could get more involved.
12.
Resource Conservation and Development Districts could partner with Non-governmental organizations for keeping working lands in private bonds.
____________________________________________________________________________ 5.
REGIONAL PERSPECTIVES FROM WEST COLORADO
A. Needs for additional natural resource, working landscape and recreational planning efforts: 1.
Plans for aquifers and watersheds - (e.g. Borrego Springs are overdraft ­ 35 years of water left in ancient aquifer) 2.
Need comprehensive restoration and maintenance plan for Salton Sea - Jurisdictional issues are interfering with planning - Planning for the Refuge is delayed, waiting for water decisions 3.
Need for more emphasis on collaboration in the Coachella Valley; getting more stakeholders involved in implementation rather than just planning 4.
Comprehensive strategic plan that pulls together fragmented plans, Areas of Critical Environmental Concern, etc. involving all the jurisdictions and stakeholders
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
21
WEST COLORADO CONTINUED
5.
Update some out of date Areas of Critical Environmental Concern in Bureau of Land Management's Plan 6.
Borrego Valley needs planning for the private lands in Anza- Borrego Valley 7.
More State level involvement in a gateway community 8.
More inter-Agency coordination across jurisdictions 9.
Research to answer specific questions (e.g. the impact of hiking on big horn sheep) B. Support to ongoing conservation efforts and the provision of recreational opportunities that could be provided by the State 1.
Catalyst for inter-Agency coordination; better communication needed between state, federal, and local agencies 2.
Public information and education - About land management and growth impact issues - The public is confused about different land ownership, oversight, management.
3.
State parks needs to do more stakeholder outreach like Bureau of Land Management and Off-highway vehicles stakeholder group 4.
Streamline state and General Service's bureaucratic processes (streamline CA Environmental Quality act and National Environmental Policy Act) to handle land acquisition and exchange - Funding is there, but too much time is required.
- Bureau of Land Management process is easier than State acquisition.
- There should be more faith at the state-level that locals can be trusted.
5.
Fish and Game to take leadership role in Salton Sea Restoration Plan - Consider recreation, economics 6.
Need better, more detailed, comprehensive, map-based and web-accessible data to support planning 7.
Create a user tax (on outdoor gear) as a funding source C. Greatest needs and next steps for implementing existing plans and priorities: 1.
Need for consistent monitoring protocols and criteria over adequate time periods - Changing administrations changes available funding, making it hard to implement plans.
2.
Convene a West Colorado "Working/ Management group" to meet quarterly Improve interagency and public communication - Engage stakeholders and agencies to discuss strategies for: promoting connectivity, corridors, impact studies, etc. - Need more tribal involvement in planning and land conservation 3.
Need better signage (e.g. there is no sign to Anza-Borrego State Park) 4.
Strategic implementation-oriented comprehensive planning with stakeholder involvement (like the North East Mojave with the Off-highway vehicle Roundtable Model, which was a positive model of collaboration) - Including Bureau of Land Management, State Parks, CA Fish and Game, US Fish and Wildlife Service, Water Agencies - Need vision and leadership at Bureau of Land Management 5.
Targeted land acquisition funding for Salton Sea; get equitable share of bond funds
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
22
WEST COLORADO CONTINUED
6.
Imperial Dunes/ Algodones Dunes - Improve biological information and baseline data - There are differing views on the balance between Off-highway vehicle and ecological protection - Restore plant communities and habitat - More and broader stakeholder involvement may be needed - AB 3030 Plan is being finalized; critical situation; differences need to be resolved 7.
More promotion of other types of recreation besides Off-highway vehicle use, especially by State Parks 8.
Water-use/ aquifer protection plans to protect ground water and reduce impacts to ecological resources - Octotillo aquifer - San Felipe Creek and marsh and Alagretti farms (Desert pupfish) 9.
Yuha Area needs protection of cultural sites 10.
Strategic acquisition of urban fringe parcels for connectivity, buffers (e.g. Joshua Hills in Coachella Valley) Overall Needs: I. More partnerships with agencies and stakeholders: funding, monitoring, implementing II.
Better agency leadership Overall Concerns and Suggestions for Legacy I. II.
III.
IV.
Need high-level review of state's distribution of resources Need science-based analysis of Salton Sea as a part of water policy decisions Need to look at functionality (health and viability) with Resources Agency to rank animal species Need better coordination/ communication with local government
Concerns and Other Issues I. II.
III.
Privatization of public lands with U.S Fish and Wildlife Service limitations Homeland security issues: 6 mile buffer along border; no impact assessment, and impacts are occurring Consider impacts of high voltage transmission lines, national gas pipelines, power plants, and geothermal plants
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
23
SMA
LL
G
ROUP SESSION:
W
IN
- WIN
STRATEGIES
The second small group session challenged participants to think about specific strategies address the concerns of local communities for continued economic development as well as needs for resource conservation in the region (Win-Win strategies).
Strategies are approaches to conserving natural resources that combine multiple tools and techniques and best utilize scare funds and resources.
Participants were divided into five small groups by subregion: North and East Mojave, West Mojave, Coachella Valley, Northeast Colorado, and West Colorado.
Certain strategies were common to all or most groups.
·
As compared to most regions across the State, where bringing land into protection was a frequently discussed strategy, in the Desert region, with so much land already in public ownership, land management was a more important focus.
All five groups talked about land management and stewardship practices as being fundamental to conservation of natural resources in the Desert region.
Included among these practices were: - Mitigation in cases where industry/ natural resource extraction takes place - Riparian fencing/ grazing management - Control of invasive plants - Promotion of native plants and landscape practices appropriate to the desert - Design of development that meets conservation goals Four of the five subregions discussed tourism as a Win-Win strategy.
Participants noted that tourism can not only contribute to economic development as a result of tourists coming into the region and spending money, but can also provide a workforce for volunteer land maintenance and management activities.
Three of the five groups also mentioned the value of recreation groups in-general (who may be either local or tourists from outside of the region).
These groups, such as hunters, mineral collectors ("rockhounds"), and Off-highway vehicle users, are a good source of volunteer labor for restoration projects and clean-ups.
Adoption of particular resources by local groups or establishment of "Friends" groups were noted as effective means to organize these stewardship activities.
·
·
The following workshop notes reflect the opinions of individual participants, focused on the subregion addressed by each group.
They do not represent the results of a group consensus process, nor even necessarily the perspective of the majority of participants.
The Legacy Project has not yet evaluated any of these ideas for their effectiveness or merit.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
24
1.
WIN-WIN STRATEGIES FOR NORTH AND EAST MOJAVE
1.
Funding for private cattle on public lands, projects that provide habitat mitigation - Fencing riparian habitat 2.
Funding literature and maps related to tourism/ recreation - Outreach re: regional trails and roads - California desert web page "California desert.gov" - Gateway visitor's center - Equestrian opportunities 3.
Adoption of resources by local groups 4.
Exotic/ invasive plant/ weed control 5.
Education projects - Community group - Existing education strategies 6.
Funding for small museums and cultural centers - Slide shows - Volunteer work projects 7.
Outreach to tribal governments; Native American Land Conservancy 8.
California Desert Fund - Desert Managers Group initiatives - Corporate funding - Congressional matching 9.
Conduct studies of connectivity and corridors, wildlife and plants 10.
Law enforcement and fire response shared between agencies 11.
County to local chamber funding - County calendars 12.
National Park Service recreational trails conservation program 13.
Advisory groups - Parks groups restructuring - Developing civil relations give and take - Develop ground rules - Renew appointments at Department of the Interior 14.
Improve communication to rural communities 15.
Regional strategies team working with state lottery dollars
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
25
2.
WIN-WIN STRATEGIES FOR WEST MOJAVE
A. Tools and Techniques 1.
Land Exchange: Bureau of Land Management Land Tenure Adjustment Program - Include smaller parcels in city and county jurisdictions- purchase from Bureau of Land Management (get compensation from title company) - Pitfalls: inaccurate valuation B. Private/ Public Trust intermediary for acquisition of smaller parcels; something along the lines of Trust for Public Land or the State Conservancies to broker real estate deals between private landowners and public entities, such as Bureau of Land Management, Wildlife Conservation Board, etc. (including funding for "broker") - State Lands, consolidate state lands commission holdings C. Grant Funding 1.
Propositions 50, 13, 40 2.
319(h) Clean Water Act, 205(j) Clean Water Act, 104(b) Clean Water Act 3.
COE 206 WRDA; Section 206 of the Water Resources Development Act administered by the Army Corps of Engineers 4.
National Park Service Rivers and Trails 5.
Department of Defense Legacy Program D. Planning money needed and technical assistance to precede implementation of projects 1.
Form partnerships (Local, State, Federal, Non-Governmental Organizations and Foundations) 2.
Infrastructure/ capacity needed (expertise, staff) to attract federal money E. Education and Outreach 1.
Utilize community colleges to disseminate info and educate 2.
University of Redlands Programs 3.
Put existing plans into college curriculum 4.
Highlight ecological differences between California and Great Basin Provinces 5.
Highlight similarities 6.
Educate every Californian about the desert 7.
Off-highway vehicle education programs 8.
Resource Conservation District education programs F. Promote 1.
Work 2.
Land 3.
Work native plants and appropriate landscaping practices with developers and private homeowners to use desert-adapted landscaping Stewardship with Resource Conservation Districts/ local government/ private landowners
G. Provide incentives for good private land management practices - "reward don't punish" H. Use school districts as demo sites for native/appropriate landscaping and recreation I. Legislation to establish weed management areas, SB 1740, - Has 19 partners included - More legislation along these lines needed
J. Invasive plant control strategies PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
26
WIN-WIN STRATEGIES FOR WEST MOJAVE CONTINUED
K. Fill jurisdictional vacuums regarding "Waters of the United States" definition and designation (e.g. dry washes) 1. Use opportunities for active and passive treated water recycling for environmental uses (site-specific) ____________________________________________________________________________ 3.
WIN-WIN STRATEGIES FOR COACHELLA VALLEY
1.
Exchange of information for people and sensitive species and development to co-exist 2.
Be willing to do on the ground experiments to figure out compatible uses - Agencies or anyone considering changes on the ground 3. Use historical conditions as a measuring tool - Get this information from residents and those with local knowledge 5.
Current and historical uses need to be considered for potential benefits 6.
Invite representatives of the stakeholder community (developer) to design a development that meets conservation goals.
7.
Consideration of local economic impacts when making decisions (i.e. forest closures affecting business in adjacent towns) and the time that local communities need to prepare for changes and new restrictions on use and development 8.
When agricultural lands are "preserved" compensation should be at least equivalent to highest value of the land 9.
Federal and state lands could be considered for transfer into private ownership, this would: increase available grazing lands, reduce management burden on government, increase tax base, and stewardship could be improved.
For Coachella Valley, local economic development is: I. II.
III.
IV.
V. Urban development Agriculture Tourism Maintenance of traditional uses Compensation for restrictions on the use of land
Other Issues and Concerns · -
Once plans are developed, they should give clear designation of what is or is not allowed to reduce uncertainty Agriculture is not typically included in the plans, so there is no certainty about what is going to be allowed or regulated; it would be good to have more certainty.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
27
4.
WIN-WIN STRATEGIES FOR NORTHEAST COLORADO
1.
Industry can contribute to resource conservation - Cement industry and gold mines (Mitsubishi operates gold mines) readily contribute money for habitat enhancement and other project.
- Mitsubishi maintains wetlands conservancy (and other plans) on land they own.
2.
Private groups can ask big companies for funding and cooperate with government agencies.
3.
Off Highway Vehicles Associations often provide volunteers for restoration and maintenance of springs, etc.
Sometimes Off Highway Vehicle industries donate vehicles to be used by enforcement agencies.
5.
Tourism can contribute to maintenance/ management.
Recreation groups, sport groups or clubs from urban areas like to spend time in desert and volunteer there with private groups.
6.
"Friends" Groups can create interpretive materials to enhance recreation - Friends of Mojave Road: records history along the road, also put together a map of trails.
7.
Desert Museum: Agencies need to work with volunteers as a knowledgeable resource.
8.
Purchase of development rights on agricultural land - It is hard to show pressure out in the desert, but if the State made it a priority, it could happen in more cases.
- When water rights for farming are sold, habitat is lost.
Metropolitan Water District does not consider habitat, and they outbid the State for water rights.
7.
Citrus groves also provide wildlife habitat.
8.
Create larger staging areas for growing equestrian groups.
They volunteer time with Forest Service.
9.
Rockhounding: provides volunteers for local clean ups, in exchange for access by Bureau of Land Management.
Water sources are also put in.
10.
Translocate sheep between isolated populations.
Enhance Department of Defense Chocolate Lands for sheep habitat.
Create a Memorandum of Understanding to have the bombing range serve as a corridor; could be a State Department of Fish and Game, Department of Defense, and volunteers partnership.
11.
Hunter Conservation groups do promote wildlife habitat, and that pulls in more hunters.
They raise funding and do work projects.
- Desert Wildlife Unlimited is local volunteer group: build guzzelers; restore natural rock tenahas for safe entry and exit; restore springs/seep wells; build artificial water sources or restore others; brought in hunters ­ good for local economy, builds a sense of ownership in public land.
12.
Santa Monica Mountains National Recreation Area is an example where State Parks coordinated well with National Park Service.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
28
WIN-WIN STRATEGIES FOR NORTHEAST COLORADO CONTINUED 13.
Mojave Desert Resource Conservation District and Bureau of Land Management partnership for Salt Cedar eradication makes canyon more available for recreation use and good for wildlife.
Sheep hunting tag funds should go back into sheep programs.
This is being done in Imperial County for the deer population.
Plant fallow land for habitat for game: attracts hunters and photographers; reduces dust, improves air quality.
14.
15.
Other Issues and Concerns ·
Should get over the presumption that economic development of resources is bad.
There are lots of minerals in desert.
The mining industry provided professional union scale jobstourism does not provide the same quality of jobs.
State Mines and Geology need to help develop and maintain mining industry.
Metropolitan Water District and State should discuss the effects of their water purchases and work out partnerships, require mitigation, and ensure that purchases are planned and coordinated rather than haphazard.
Existing Government plans need to be funded and implemented, to see if they work.
Trust needs to be built between local interests and Non-Governmental Organizations (NGO's).
Some members of the group felt that Federal Endangered Species Act should be reformed to reduce litigation and improve cooperation between stakeholders.
·
· ·
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
29
4.
WIN-WIN STRATEGIES FOR WEST COLORADO
1.
Anza Borrego Institute - Brings tourists (who spend money), education, research.
- Addresses whole Colorado Desert area.
2.
Partnerships and/or "Friends" groups to manage public lands.
- e.g. Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy 3.
Transfer Development Credits. - e.g. Coachella Valley Habitat Conservation Plan for Fringe-Toed Lizard 4.
Off highway vehicles and related recreation users paying for/ or implementing programs: - e.g. trails, signage, restoration, clean-ups such as Bureau of Land Management/ Forest Service Memorandum of Understanding projects and Adopt-a-Trail Programs; promotes stewardship 5.
Users pay for stewardship on private and public lands - e.g. Cosumnes River - farmers, hunters, canoers - e.g. locally, Sand Dunes fee demo 6. Use of Private Land for desired uses like Off highway vehicle recreation - Public pays to mitigate for resource impacts on public lands.
- Public funds that are used to accommodate special recreational uses (like OHV use) should be available to mitigate for any damage, liability or other costs incurred by adjacent private land owners.
7.
Mitigation for development (Resource extraction or urban) that goes beyond the requirement.
- e.g. gas pipeline and historic road (State Historic Preservation Office - designated) restores/ improved 8.
Film entertainment user fees on public lands for conservation, mitigation, and/ or revenue; local economic benefits.
- Question: Is the public entity indemnified? 9.
Conservation easements/ Banks - Potential Limitations: loss of local tax revenue - Can we change Payment In Lieu of Taxes (PILT) to acreage not population? 10.
Responsible management of concessions on public lands - e.g. Anza-Borrego tourists, dune buggy rentals 11.
Grants (unused) for interpretation, trail work, education, etc. - Public and private 12.
Retire/close grazing permit allotments - State help fund 13.
Lifelong education: learning to protect ecosystems not just individual resources.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
30
III.
Information Exchange tell us what data might be incorrect and what additional information was needed to help them do their jobs better.
At the Data Catalogs station, participants were asked, "Are there key restoration and monitoring projects not on the data base?" California Environmental Resources Evaluation System (CERES) staff fielded questions about the data walk and provided a way for participants to add "data about regional data" to the online CERES data catalogue.
The Urban Growth Model displayed projections of population growth distribution and potential urban/ suburban development in the region.
This station garnered great interest because participants visually witnessed possible future urban growth scenarios and how they change with different assumptions or constraints on growth.
Many participants stopped to visit the Demo Decision Support Tools Station staffed by Environmental Systems Research Institute (ESRI) employees.
They demonstrated basic and advanced concepts in GIS applications and green mapping.
Questions at the station ranged from very technical to more basic ones, such as: What data is available and how is it collected? ESRI staffers noted that the participants were sophisticated and wellinformed about GIS technologies.
Participants also contributed information about Existing and Emerging Conservation Plans, as well as about places that they considered to be Regional and Statewide Conservation Priorities.
Their input is recorded on the maps that follow.
An equally important component of the Spotlight on Conservation workshop was the Information Exchange.
This is where the Legacy Project displayed existing datasets on regional and statewide maps and gathered information on existing regional conservation plans and priorities from the participants.
Participants had several opportunities over the day and a half workshop to view the mapped information, interact with staff, and, most importantly, to provide Legacy with valuable data, feedback, and ideas on conservation.
STATION RESULTS In The Data Walk portion of the Information Exchange, regional and statewide maps displayed existing datasets of natural resources, working landscapes, and urban growth projections (such as land cover, impaired waterways, etc).
Legacy staff members were available to talk about the different maps.
Participants were directed to
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
31
COLORADO MOJAVE DESERT EXISTING AND EMERGING CONSERVATION PLANNING EFFORTS The dot numbers on the map below are keyed to the subsequent table, which gives information about each plan, such as name of effort, purpose, and the source of information.
Of the 21 conservation efforts, nearly half were identified as addressing more than one resource type.
Conservation of Aquatic Biodiversity or water resources was cited as an important goal for eight of the 21 programs (38%).
Four of the plans focus on military installations.
Rare or sensitive species are noted as the primary focus of three of the plans.
.
Colorado - Mojave Desert Existing and Emerging Conservation Planning Efforts
Figure 2.
Locations of Existing and Emerging Conservation Planning Efforts identified by workshop participants for the Colorado ­ Mojave Desert.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
32
Table 1: Conservation Planning Efforts (CPE's) identified by workshop participants for the Colorado - Mojave Desert.
AB = aquatic biodiversity, watershed including water issues TB = terrestrial biodiversity, habitat WL = working landscapes US = urban open space RR = rural recreation lands Dot Name # Type of Resource(s) Addressed AB, TB, WL, RR County Inyo/ Sierra/ Tulare Inyo Geographic scope Sierra Nevada Forests; US Forest Service Region 6 Lower Owens River, Inyo County near Independence Primary Purpose Forest ecosystem; spotted owl; yellow legged frog Source of Information Affiliation
3
1 Sierra Nevada Framework 2 Lower Owens AB, TB, RR River Project
Andrea Clark County of Inyo County of Inyo, Water Department
Re-watering of Lower Owens Brian River, which was dried up as Cashore a result of LA Dept.
Water and Power water diversions to aqueduct.
Removal and control of Salt Cedar and other invasive plants.
3 Northern and AB, TB, RR Eastern Mojave Desert Management Plan 4 Surprise Canyon Project 5 Amargosa River Drainage
Inyo/ San Northern and Eastern Amargosa River Canyon, etc.
Andrea Clark County of Bernardino Mojave Desert Inyo
Inyo
6 Prospective, Friends of Great Falls Basin 7 China Lake Naval Air Weapons Station
AB
Inyo
Extreme 4-wheel activity, Dick Crowe winding up canyon, etc; 5 miles of aquatic/ riparian running water; eligible for wild scenic river Private lands with The Nature Conservancy has Brian Brown major springs on acquired some of the Amargosa headwaters in NV.
Have been reaching out to landowners about conservation easements Has Area of Critical Protect habitat; ephemeral Bob Strub Environmental water falls; yearly clean up; Concern and Wildlife help manage habitat; use as Study Area educational tool Draft Environmental Impact Statement/ Environmental Impact Report comments due 01-27-03; Interim Integrated Natural Resource Management Plan Flood control in cities by upper watershed storm water control Rebecca Jones
One Canyon with an old mining road
Rob Scanland - The Nature Conservancy, Reno/ Las Vegas, Nevada
AB, TB, WL
Dept.
Fish and Game
8 Ridgecrest N/A Coordinated Resource Management Plan 9 AB 303 Groundwater monitoring
Kern
Watershed; flood control in city
Donna Thomas
Kern
Watershed
Ground water monitoring
Donna Thomas
CA Association of Resource Conservation Districts Board CA Association of Resource Conservation Districts Board
3
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
33
Table 1 cont'd.
Dot Name # 10 Edwards Air Force Base Type of Resource(s) Addressed AB, TB, WL County Geographic scope Primary Purpose California Environmental Quality Act/ National Environmental Protection Act, Interim Integrated Natural Resource Management Plan Storage, repair, training Source of Information Rebecca Jones 3
Affiliation Dept.
Fish and Game
11 Barstow, WL Marine Corps logistics base 12 Pacific Crest RR Trail Realignment 13 ?
Kern/ Los Angeles/ San Bernardino/ Riverside Los Antelope Valley Angeles (started around 1990)
5 miles east of Barstow, between Highways 15 and 40 Canada to Mexico
Manny Joia
Move the trail away from urban encroachment pressures
Jennifer Hranilovich
Trust for Public Land
14 Riverwalk US, RR Plan 15 29 Palms AB, TB, WL Marine Corps Base 16 Lower Colorado River Multi Species Conservation Program 17 Anza Borrego RR General Plan 18 Bighorn TB Sheep, Mule Deer, Mountain Lion study 19 Salton Sea Habitat Conservation Plan for water transfer 20 Imperial Sand Dunes Plan 21 Eastern San TB, WL, RR Diego County Plan 3
Boundaries may be different
Dust control from old agricultural lands; RCD Air Quality Management District (Los Angeles County); Dust measures that are more effective Recreation Rebecca Jones National Environmental Rebecca Protection Act (not California Jones Environmental Quality Act) Interim Integrated Natural Resource Management Plan Fred Worthley/ Dick Crowe
Air Quality Management District, Antelope Valley Dept.
Fish and Game Dept.
Fish and Game
Bureau of Land Management
Desert, San Diego San Diego Anza Borrego and Cuyamaca Rancho State Parks
Preservation/ Recreation Interaction of major species with each other and with human habitation Mitigation of the water transfer
Linda Carson Anza Borrego Foundation Mark Anza Borrego Jorgensen Desert State Park Glen Black CA Dept.
Fish and Game
Milk vetch in sand dunes habitat, dune buggy vs. Pearson's milk vetch Revise; for bighorn sheep, grazing, recreation
Dick Crowe Dick Crowe
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
34
REGIONAL CONSERVATION PRIORITIES At the regional conservation priorities station, participants were asked to place dots on a state map to identify the top three places and/ or resources needing additional conservation attention in the region.
The locations identified by participants as regional conservation priorities are shown on the map below.
It is important to note that these dots do not represent the priorities of the participant group as a whole; rather, it is a collection of individual's ideas.
This information can be used to consider new places for investment as well as to identify interested groups for a particular location.
Of the 80 locations identified, the Salton Sea was given the greatest amount of attention, receiving a total of five dots.
The Sea's importances to shorebirds and as a pacific flyway stop were highlighted, with restoration, wetland preservation, and water conservation noted as needed actions.
Many of the other chosen areas centered on habitat linkages, riparian areas, endangered species habitat, and areas threatened by development.
Recommendations for needed actions included invasive species control, water management, and crossjurisdictional and inter-agency collaboration.
Additional notable sites that were assigned at least 3 dots included the Amargosa River, wildlife corridors adjacent to Joshua Tree National Park, and dune habitats in Imperial County.
Colorado - Mojave Desert Workshop Regional Conservation Priorities
Figure 3.
Locations of Regional Conservation Priorities identified by workshop participants for the Colorado ­ Mojave Desert.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP 35
Table 2.
Regional Conservation Priorities identified by workshop participants for the Colorado Mojave Desert Dot # 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 Location Yucca Mountain nuclear waste depository Amargosa River Carson Slough Surprise Canyon Death Valley National Park Amargosa River Panimint Valley, east side County Inyo Inyo San Bernardino Inyo Importance Profound long term implications Yucca Mountain nuclear waste repository Threatened and endangered species Perennial riparian area Access/ better staging areas for horses High importance Avian habitat Needed action Water monitoring Source of Affiliation 4 Information Brian Brown Shoshone Museum
Inyo Inyo
8
Southwestern Inyo
Inyo
West Mojave Planning Area, local government buy-in and compromise Riparian habitat, listed species Amargosa Vole habitat and other species Extremely important; a real desert river
9 10 11
San Bernardino Tecopa Hotsprings/ Inyo Grimshaw Lake Amargosa River Inyo/ San Canyon Bernardino
Afton Canyon
12
California/ Nevada boundary
13 14
Inyo/ San Bernardino; Nye/ Clark in Nevada Kingston Wilderness Inyo/ San Study Area Bernardino Coyote Mountains Imperial/ Wilderness San Diego Ridgecrest East of 395 Rand area, Red Mt. Kelso Valley Triangle between Ridgecrest, Trona, and Randsburg Mojave Desert Preserve Between Barstow and Laughlin Desert Tortoise Natural Area San Bernardino San Bernardino Kern Kern San Bernardino Kern
High importance
County of Inyo; Inyo Co.
Yucca Mt. Coordination Water rights to assure species Ileene California Native persistence Anderson Plant Society Eliminate off highway vehicles Ileene California Native Anderson Plant Society Larger staging areas to provide Pam Barber J-Spear Ranch access Scenic preservation; tourism/ recreation Improve and protect spring; Bob Strub; Ridgecrest Steering educational kiosk Bob Pastro Committee; Ridgecrest Bureau of Land Management Support from CA Dept Fish Andrea County of Inyo; and Game and financial Clark West Mojave support (Resources Agency) to Management Plan implement plan Water management; tamarisk removal Stop sewage leak; protect groundwater Wild and scenic designation Brian Brown Shoshone Museum; Bureau of Land Management; Army Corp of Engineers Water Conservation District or agreement between CA and NV to control water use.
Wilderness designation and enforcement Brian Brown Shoshone Museum Harriet Allen Desert Protective Council Review of regulation Off highway vehicle control Acquisition of private land from willing seller Help develop off road travel triangle.
Use money to protect sensitive resources: biological and archeological Allow development and extraction of minerals necessary to the economy Larger staging areas to provide access Land acquisition Margie Balfour Ileene Anderson Robert Strub California Native Plant Society Friends of Sawbone
Increase state attention to long Andrea term groundwater impacts Clark
15 16 17 18
Priority site; lots of off highway vehicle trespass Fossil shells, sand dunes; bighorn; endangered species, wilderness, geologic Air quality; red/green tag high occupancy vehicles Conservation and restoration; plants and wildlife Endemic plants Recreation
19 20 21
Access/ better staging areas for horses Threatened and endangered species
Pam Barber J-Spear Ranch Daniel R. Patterson Center for Biological Diversity/ Desert Tortoise Natural Area
4
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
36
Table 2 cont'd.
Dot # 22 Location Freemont West Mojave Desert-wide County San Bernardino Imperial/ Riverside/ San Bernardino San Bernardino Imperial/ Riverside/ San Bernardino San Bernardino Inyo Imperial/ Riverside/ San Bernardino Importance Recreational purposes Needed action Establishment of Off Highway Vehicle funding Source of Information Jim Wilson 4
Affiliation American Motorcycle Association Lost Coyotes District 37
23
High importance
24 25
Mojave River Desert-wide
Riparian Oak High importance
Determine why desert tortoise is declining just as fast in closed areas as in well-used areas Tamarisk and Arundo removal Rhody Sopia More funding to properly maintain all types of public use trails and routes Restore wetlands Support for interpretive materials and visitor centers Andrea Clark
California Conservation Corps
26 27 28
Harper Lake Tecopa/ Shoshone CA Desert-wide
29 30
31 32 33 34
35
36 37 38
39
40
Reduce impacts of habitat fragmentation by not concentrating/ increasing off highway vehicle use on the few remaining open routes Daggett San Historical (original Preserve private site (Alf Cliff Walker Mojave River Bernardino blacksmith shop) family) Valley Museum in Barstow Mojave Desert San Assist in transition from rural to Christie Mojave Desert Resource Bernardino urban; mitigation, education Robinson Resource Conservation Conservation District High Desert District Camp Cady San Riparian habitat; listed Water management; tamarisk Bernardino species removal Desert Imperial/ Highest importance Proper consultation on Riverside endangered species by Bureau of Land Management Tejon Ranch Kern Connections to Tehachapi Acquisition/ conservation Ray US Fish and and Coast Ranges; easement Bransfield Wildlife Service, ecotone; condors Ventura Chemuhemi San Tortoise Habitat More monitoring in Desert Jero California Bernardino Wildlife Management Areas Ferguson Association of 4 and wilderness Wheel Drive Clubs, Inc.
Mojave Desert San Critical importance Support/encourage Christie Mojave Desert Resource Bernardino stewardship on privately held Robinson Resource Conservation ag land; maintain as ag Conservation District High Desert District Sawtooth Canyon San Raptor nests; bighorn; Management Plan Bernardino tortoise; with rockclimbing and off highway vehicles Palmdale/ Lancaster Los Angeles Bedroom and growth Regional planning community for Los (conservation) Angeles Throughout 7 counties Military base buffering Planning; joint management Jennifer The Trust for Public Colorado/ Mojave and joint management to and acquisition Hranilovich Land and Coachella protect species Valley San Andreas rift Los Angeles Can serve as an Planning Laurie Lile City of Palmdale zone important urban open space and provide hazard mitigation Ana Lake Los Angeles One of only a few natural Acquisition; restoration Laurie Lile City of Palmdale; sag ponds left City of Palmdale General Plan 4
Major migration rest stop for birds Old Spanish Trail just added to National Historic Trail system High importance
County of Inyo
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
37
Table 2 cont'd.
Dot # 41 42 Location Big Rock Wash Lucerne Valley County Importance Needed action Preservation; Caltrans should build a bridge over it Acquisition Source of Information 4
Affiliation
Los Angeles Major wildlife corridor San Bernadino High importance
Marie Brashear
43
Big Rock Creek
Los Angeles Important wildlife corridor Acquisition at risk of sand/ gravel mining Fire management; Planning and protection viewshed; wildlife; habitat High importance Acquire Old Woman Spring
Laurie Lile
44
San Gabriel Mtn.
Foothills to the North
45
Los Angeles/ San Bernardino Between Lucerne San Valley and Johnson Bernadino Valley
Jennifer Hranilovich Marie Brashear
Society for the Protection and Care of Wildlife; Dept. of Fish and Game; West Mojave Management Plan; US Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura City of Palmdale; West Mojave Management Plan; LA Co.
General Plan The Trust for Public Land Society for the Protection and Care of Wildlife; West Mojave Management Plan; US Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura Mojave Desert Resource Conservation District Fire Safe Council/ Mountain Coalition
46
Mojave River Watershed San Jacinto/ Coachella Valley
San Bernardino Riverside
Critical importance
Surveyed, Assessed, Addressed, Inventoried West Mojave Plan State should declare emergency to affirm county declarations.
Christie Robinson Gary Scott/ Dick Bergeron
47
48
Summit Valley
San Bernardino
49 50 51 52 53
Joshua Tree National Park Lake Arrowhead Joshua Tree National Park
San Bernardino San Bernardino
Excessive fuels build up since 1910 (caused by "no action" management, bark beetle and drought) threatens destruction of all habitat as evidenced by recent fires.
Also threatens recreation and economic survival of surrounding communities.
High importance; one of three desert drainages with Federally endangered Arroyo toad; threatened with urban development and nonnative species Native American 175,000 year old site Trail System
Land acquisition; management Ray of beavers, bullfrog, salt cedar; Bransfield protection is planned, but prospects are uncertain
US Fish and Wildlife Service, Ventura
Establish a trail group to connect all lakes in area Develop corridor Acquisition Acquisition
Rhody Sopia
California Conservation Corps
San Wildlife transition Bernardino/ Riverside San Gorgonio Pass Riverside Regional linkage Riverside Ecological processes; habitat
Bill Havert Bill Havert
Willow Hole sand transport and fault dunes
Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy; Multiple Species Habitat Conservation Plan
4
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
38
Table 2 cont'd.
Dot # 54 Location Between Indio Hills and Joshua Tree Nat'l Park Chino Canyon County Riverside Importance Regional linkage; desert tortoise habitat Needed action Acquisition Source of Information Bill Havert 4
Affiliation
55
Riverside
Endangered species habitat; peninsular bighorn
Acquisition
56
Fan Hill, between Riverside Coachella Preserve and Joshua Tree Nat'l Park San Bernardino Coachella Valley San Bernardino Riverside
Wildlife corridor; endangered species; protect National Park Critical importance
Acquire
57 58 59 60
61 62 63 64 65 66 67
Wildlife corridor next Riverside to Joshua Tree National Park Colorado River Imperial/ Riverside/ San Bernardino La Quinta Riverside Salton Sea, river Riverside delta Salton Sea Salton Sea Salton Sea Salton Sea Borrego Springs Imperial Imperial/ Riverside Imperial Imperial/ Riverside San Diego
Address excessive fuels build up since 1910, see comment for dot # 47.
Protects Coachella Valley Support for upcoming Fringe-toed lizard Environmental Assessment (proposed expansion) High importance Protect corridor next to park Riparian habitat; recreation; scenic Bighorn Sheep Habitat; pacific flyways High importance Shore birds and fish High importance Very high importance High importance Fee/ easement protection of banks Acquisition Preserve; restore
Coachella Valley Mtns Conservancy; Multiple Species Habitat Conservation Plan Bill Havert Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy; Multiple Species Habitat Conservation Plan Joan Taylor Friends of Indian Canyons; Coachella Valley Habitat Conservation Plan Gary Scott/ Fire Safe Council/ Dick Mountain Coalition Bergeron Sylvia US Fish Wildlife Pelizza Service Terry Wold Jennifer Hranilovich The Wilderness Society The Trust for Public Land
Joan Taylor Friends of Indian Canyons; Bureau of Reclamation
68 69 70
San Felipe Creek/ San Sebastian Marsh Cuyamaca
Imperial/ San Diego San Diego
Threatened and endangered species Immediately needed
Clean it up Better water conservation measures Restoration Mitigation of sea; wetlands preservation; take action before water transfers Conserve water supply - only Tom Weber 35 years potable water left- no other options to acquire or treat water.
Can only return agricultural land to natural desert.
Possibly CA Dept.
Parks and Rec. can acquire land.
Invasive plant control, off road Daniel R. vehicle limits Patterson
Borrego Water District
Center for Biological Diversity
71 72 4
San Felipe Creek, Imperial Riparian areas; Flat tailed horned lizard Areas of Critical Environmental Concern; Bighorn overlay; historic trails Brawley site Imperial Imperial Sand Dunes Recreation Imperial
Address excessive fuels build up since 1910, see comment for dot # 47.
Endangered species State leadership in interagency issues; pupfish; off coordination on management/ highway vehicles; enforcement through agriculture; Gypsum mine Memoranda of Understanding and narrow gage railroad (agencies, Co.s, Mining Company, Environmental groups)
Gary Scott/ Fire Safe Council/ Dick Mountain Coalition Bergeron Harriet Allen Desert Protective Council
Water quality improvements; sewage cleanup Air quality data; economic data Roni Frost
Bureau of Land Management
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
39
Table 2 cont'd.
Dot # Location Area 73 74 75 Rice Drain Algodones Dunes Railroad Jacumba to El Centro Imperial Imperial Imperial/ San Diego Agricultural wetlands for water quality improvement Threatened and Limit off road vehicle use Daniel R. endangered species Patterson Riparian streambed; State leadership for bighorn overlay; coordination: BLM and 2 Co.s disastrous repair of plus Dept.
Parks and Rec., trestles and tunnels for railroad buffs, and commercial weight trains congressman Duncan Hunter in State Park boundary (who opposes) and BLM Carrizo Gorge Federal Wilderness and State Wilderness Bighorn, fossil shells, Coordination between State Harriet Allen sand dunes Parks and Bureau of Land Management (BLM) re: Bighorn, otherwise management is BLM and Memoranda of Understanding on lawsuit Home to unique species - Protect dunes between Terry plants and animals; Highways 80 and 78 from off Weiner several endemic species road vehicles; has wilderness quality to it, should be protected as wilderness; CA Wild Heritage Campaign Wilderness Bill Endemic plants Pro-active protection from Ileene border patrol/ illegal Anderson immigrants Endemic stand of Information and visitor kiosk Crucifixion Thorn parking for 5 - 6 cars; fencing and patrol by officers on highway 98 Cultural sites; Protection enforcement Harriet Allen endangered species; aquifer County Importance Needed action Source of Information 4
Affiliation
Center for Biological Diversity
76
Coyote Mountains
Imperial
Desert Protective Council
77
Algodones Dunes (South)
Imperial
Desert Protective Council
78 79
McCain Valley
San Diego
California Native Plant Society
Highway 98 SE of I- Imperial 8 junction Intaglio Yuha Area; aquifer 4
80
Imperial
Desert Protective Council
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
40
STATEWIDE CONSERVATION PRIORITIES At the statewide conservation priorities station, participants were asked to place dots on a state map to identify the top three places and resources needing additional conservation attention in the state.
The locations are shown on the map below.
It is important to note that these dots do not represent the priorities of the participant group as a whole; rather, it is a collection of individual's ideas.
The dot numbers are keyed to the subsequent table, which gives information about each site, such as location, reason for conservation needs, and the source of information.
Of the 35 locations identified, the South Coast, from Los Angeles to San Diego, was given the most attention, receiving 13 dots.
In this region, clusters centered around the San Gabriel Mountains, the Santa Clara River headwaters, and locations near the city of San Diego, including San Dieguito River Park.
The Amargosa River in Death Valley was also highlighted, receiving three dots.
On a statewide basis, habitat linkages; threatened, endangered and sensitive species' protection; management of water resources; and agricultural concerns were repeatedly cited as important concerns.
The areas identified by participants as statewide conservation priorities are shown below.
Desert Workshop Statewide Conservation Priorities
Figure 4.
Locations of Statewide Conservation Priorities identified by workshop participants from the Colorado ­ Mojave Desert.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
41
Table 3.
Statewide Conservation Priorities identified by workshop participants for the Colorado ­ Mojave Desert.
Dot Location # 1 Klamath River County Siskiyou Importance High importance Needed action Source of Affiliation Information Dick Bergeron Mountain Coalition 5
2 3 4 5 6
Alturas Trinity River
Modoc Trinity
Tahoe National Sierra/ Forest Nevada Placer ­ El Dorado Foothills Bay Delta Placer/ El Dorado Multiple
CA Dept. of Fish and Game has reported questionable results from their study of last year's salmon die off.
There needs to be adequate review of data and scientific principles used before such results are published.
Water quality, ag land Help farmers/ ranchers run-off issues implement best management practices For wildlife and recreation Allocation of water for Elena fisheries MisQuez Old growth; owl habitat; Fill in checkerboard Pete Nichols connectivity ownership Blue Oak Community Revise forest practices for Blue Oak protection; Acquisition Management; restoration; acquisition Management; acquisition Pete Nichols Bill Havert
California Wilderness Coalition California Wilderness Coalition Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy
Aquatic ecosystems
7
Sierra Nevadas Multiple
Habitat; ecosystems; watershed; recreation
Bill Havert
8
Lower Owens River Owens Lake, Owens River
Inyo
9
Inyo
LA Dept.
Water and Financial support to Power rewatering of lower implement weed Owens River management and recreation program Largest State restoration Has no education or project at wetlands on ecotourism support Lower Owens River Project and Owens Lake Yucca Mountain water and transportation impacts Found eligible as a wild and scenic river
Andrea Clark County of Inyo
Robert Strub
RCD, Mojave Desert Mountain Educational Committee
10 11 12 13
Increase Statewide concern about longterm effects on groundwater Amargosa River Inyo Financial support for nonmotorized recreation and interpretation Death Valley Larger staging areas for Larger staging area at Salt access for equestrian use Tanks for horse groups Desert Mono/ San Very high importance Partnerships for restoration Bernardino/ of small riparian areas; low Riverside/ cost, great benefit Inyo San Bernardino Central Santa California Coast Barbara/ San Luis Obispo/ Monterey/ Santa Cruz Mojave Desert Better staging areas for better access High importance Especially on highway 95
Amargosa River Inyo
Andrea Clark County of Inyo Andrea Clark County of Inyo Pam Barber Marie Brashear J-Spear Ranch Society for the Protection and Care of Wildlife J-Spear Ranch US Fish and Wildlife Service
14 15
Pam Barber
16
Afton Canyon 5.
San Bernardino
Better staging areas for better access
Establish a network of Ray protected streams and Bransfield associated uplands to support functional riparian communities, e.g. nesting habitat for pond turtles, upland buffers to maintain water quality for fish, dispersal and foraging habitat for CA Red-legged frogs Allow horse parking/ access Pam Barber in area
J-Spear Ranch
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
42
Table 3 cont'd.
Dot Location # 17 Tejon Ranch 18 19 20 21 Southern Tehachapis Mojave River/ Afton Canyon Tejon Ranch County Kern/ Los Angeles Kern/ Los Angeles San Bernardino Kern/ Los Angeles Importance Critical for cross valley connectivity Undeveloped large habitat blocks threatened with development Threatened and endangered species Needed action Acquisition Get under conservation protection as soon as possible Invasive species control; restoration Protection Acquisition near Poppy Preserve Source of Information Pete Nichols Ileene Anderson Daniel R. Patterson Jennifer Hranilovich Larry Lapre Affiliation 5
California Wilderness Coalition CA Native Plant Society Center For Biological Diversity The Trust for Public Land Bureau of Land Management Center For Biological Diversity Bureau of Land Management CA Native Plant Society CA Native Plant Society The Trust for Public Land The Wilderness Society The Trust for Public Land The Wilderness Society CA Native Plant Society
22 23 24 25 26 27 28
Buffer; habitat; connectivity; historic; recreation Poppy Preserve Los Angeles High priority linkage between Poppy Preserve and Angeles National Forest Desert grazing San Tortoise recovery allotments Bernardino and others Big Rock Creek Los Angeles Highest priority, linkage in west Mojave Plan Santa Clara Los Angeles River headwaters Newhall Ranch Los Angeles Calleguas Creek watershed Lytle Creek San Gabriel Foothills San Timoteo River San Jacinto River Fallbrook Algodones Dunes Ventura San Bernardino Los Angeles/ San Bernardino San Bernardino Riverside San Diego Imperial Assures (or helps to) proper function of river use process Endemic species; watershed of Santa Clara River Agricultural; groundwater recharge; flood control; sprawl control; historic High importance
Buy permits, retire allotments Daniel R. Patterson Acquisition near Saddleback Larry Lapre Buttes State Park Get under conservation protection as soon as possible Acquire and end "dumb" growth Agricultural use protection; hillside protection Restoration and protection Ileene Anderson Ileene Anderson Jennifer Hranilovich Terry Wold Jennifer Hranilovich Terry Wold Ileene Anderson
Buffer; habitat; recreation; Acquisition viewshed; run-off High importance Restoration and protection
29 30 31 32 33
North County San Diego Multiple Habitat Conservation Plan Volcan Mountain San Dieguito River Park 5.
34
San Diego
34
San Diego
Endemic species of Get under conservation plants; maintain hydrology protection as soon as possible Farmland disappearing; Conservation easements and water use efficiency water conservation education Threatened and Limit Off Road Vehicles endangered species; Low impact recreation Connectivity to Acquisition funding surrounding protected areas: Camp Pendleton, San Margarita Ecological Reserve and Cleveland National Forest Unique forest resources Acquisition funding important to CA Dept. of Forestry and San Diego Co.
Recreational and high Acquisition funding biological value of river/ riparian watershed
Daniel R. Patterson
Center For Biological Diversity
Alex Tynberg The Trust for Public Land
Alex Tynberg The Trust for Public Land Alex Tynberg The Trust for Public Land
Source of information only.
Does not necessarily represent a formal priority of organization.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
43
IV.
FINAL REPORT The Legacy Project will place an interim report from each workshop on the Legacy Project website, once it has been reviewed by participants for accuracy.
The project will also further examine the existing and emerging plans, suggested conservation priorities and strategies, and the proposed places for priority investment in the region.
The Legacy Project will produce a final report summarizing results from all nine workshops late in 2003.
The report will be available on the website or by mail for review by all interested parties, and will be . the basis for future dialogue with regional citizens.
A final wrap-up session will be held in July 16, 2003 in Sacramento.
Information and analyses from these workshops will be shared with Resources Agency departments, boards and conservancies to assist them in their conservation investment decision-making.
Workshop results will also be applied in developing better data and planning-support tools and information for stakeholders across the state.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
44
APPENDIX A WORKSHOP LOGISTICS The invitation process ·
The Legacy Project and its consultants identified a wide range of stakeholders from throughout the region to provide as much balance in geographic distribution as possible for the Colorado - Mojave workshop.
The compilation of the invitation list and acceptance of registrations over the Legacy website was accomplished with the help of many people.
The practical logistics of the effort are summarized as follows: ·
As the RSVP responses were received, pre-workshop packets were subsequently mailed out.
The packets contained detailed information on the locations, agenda, the discussion group process, and a detailed description of the Information Exchange.
·
Workshop participation ·
The workshop regions were developed based on the California Biodiversity Council Bioregions of the State.
Approximately 90 Advisory Committee members from public agencies, businesses, non-profit organizations, and the private sector were brought together to suggest potential candidates for the Colorado - Mojave workshop.
The list was carefully reviewed and balanced for categorical inclusion and regional representation.
We included a wide variety of stakeholders from public agencies to private landowners, from environmental groups to agricultural interests.
Further, we continually reviewed the geographic representation, working by counties, and increased the outreach to underrepresented areas.
Over 200 invitation letters were mailed.
RSVPs were received either by phone, postcard or e-mail.
The respondent lists were reviewed for balance in category and geographic representation, and the follow up outreach focused on underrepresented groups.
There were 87 participants over the course of the day and a half workshop.
·
·
·
·
Pre-workshop packets PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
45
Workshop Agenda California Legacy Project Colorado - Mojave Desert Spotlight on Conservation Workshop
AGE
NDA
The California Resources Agency
Ramada Inn, 15494 Palmdale Road Victorville, CA. January 16: Day 1 1:00 pm Welcome by Ron Rempel, CA Department of Fish and Game, Deputy Director, Habitat Conservation Division, and David Widell, CA Department of Parks and Recreation, Deputy Director, OffHighway Motor Vehicle Recreation Division.
Introductions and workshop overview.
Presentation and discussion of the Legacy Project: Madelyn Glickfeld, Assistant Secretary, The Resources Agency, California Legacy Project.
Break Presentation of existing regional planning efforts: Bill Havert, Executive Director, Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy; Bill Haigh, Lead, West Mojave Plan, Desert District, Bureau of Land Management; Dick Crowe, Resource Management Specialist, Desert District, Bureau of Land Management.
Brainstorm session on regional concerns, issues, and challenges Objective: To gain a sense of the unique issues and challenges of the region and how they affect conservation efforts.
Sponsors
Platinum: Desert Managers Group California Department of Parks and Recreation California OHV Recreation Division Trust for Public Land The Wildlands Conservancy US Geological Survey Gold: State Parks Foundation Bureau of Land Management Silver: Defenders of Wildlife
1:30 1:30
2:15 2:45
3:45 .
4:30
Information Exchange; light buffet.
Objective: To share information on natural resources, rural recreation, and working landscapes in the region.
6:30 pm
Adjourn
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
46
California Legacy Project Colorado - Mojave Desert Spotlight on Conservation Workshop
AGE
NDA
January 17: Day 2 8:00 am 8:30 8:45 9:00 Information Exchange; continental breakfast.
Welcome Introduction to 2nd day's activities; brief review of 1st day; review of small-group exercise on conservation "criteria."
First Small group session; regional perspectives: Objective: To gain a sense of additional natural resource, working landscape and recreational planning needs beyond those already underway; future state partnership opportunities to aid in natural resource and working landscape conservation and the provision of recreational opportunities; and the greatest needs for implementing conservation plans.
11:00 11:15
Break Potential Uses of the California Conservation Digital Atlas.
Objective: To allow participants to review this web-based tool with interactive maps that can help support planning efforts.
11:45 1:30 pm 1:45 pm
Information Exchange; buffet lunch Explanation of afternoon small-group session.
Second small group session; strategies that support resourceconservation and economic needs.
Objective: To gain a sense of those conservation priorities and specific strategies that can offer mutual benefit to conservation and local economies.
2:40 2:50 4:00 pm
Break Report back on workshop results to Luree Stetson, Deputy Secretary for Environmental Programs, The Resources Agency.
Brief discussion of next steps and adjourn
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
47
APPENDIX B DESERT PLANNING EFFORTS The following are summaries of the issues, planning criteria, and management goals included in the planning documents for several large-scale Desert Region planning efforts: Anza Borrego Desert State Park Preliminary General Plan, California State Parks (www.parks.ca.gov) The Plan identifies the following Key Issues and corresponding Goals and Guidelines: Physical Resources Geology: protect and preserve unique geological resources and features; protect sensitive soils Hydrology: protect surface and groundwater and strive to restore sustainable and ecologically functional regional watersheds Paleontology: protect and restore paleontological resources in perpetuity for scientific and educational values Significant and Sensitive Biota Protect native biota; preserve and encourage recovery of sensitive species Reduce presence and further invasion of exotic species Cultural Resources Identify, document and evaluate cultural resources Identify, protect, and interpret places holding cultural or religious significance to Native Americans and other ethnic communities Interpretation Provide opportunities to increase visitors' knowledge and appreciation of significant natural and cultural resources of the Park Recreation Maintain qualities of solitude and wildness; make management decisions to promote health of desert ecosystems Provide variety of recreational experiences while ensuring protection of resources
Lower Colorado River Multi-Species Conservation Program Habitat Conservation Plan, U.S. Bureau of Reclamation and States of Arizona, Nevada, and California (http://www.lcrmscp.org) The overall goal of the Plan is to develop and implement a Multi-Species Conservation Program that will: -
Conserve habitat and work toward the recovery of threatened and endangered species, as well as reduce the likelihood of additional species listings under the Endangered Species Act and California Endangered Species Act Accommodate present waster diversion and power production and optimize opportunities for future water and power development, to the extent consistent with the law, and Provide the basis for take authorization pursuant to the Endangered Species Act and California Endangered Species Act.
-
-
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
48
The Multi-Species Conservation Program includes the following conservation measures: - -
Maintenance of a portion of existing important covered species habitat in the Multi-Species Conservation Program planning area Creation or restoration of habitat to increase the extent of habitat in the Multi-Species Conservation Program planning area Long-term management of created and restored habitat to maintain and preserve ecological functions Avoidance and minimization of impacts resulting from covered activities and Multi-Species Conservation Program implementation of covered species and their habitats Population enhancement measures that directly of indirectly increase abundance of covered species Monitoring and research necessary to assess and improve conservation measure effectiveness
- -
- -
Conservation site-selection criteria will include: - - - - - - -
Presence of and proximity to existing occupied covered species habitats Suitability of site conditions for restoring habitat for specific species (e.g. appropriate soils, availability of water) Available requisite infrastructure (e.g. access roads, irrigation-related infrastructure) Relative suitability for achieving multiple restoration objectives through an integrated mosaic of habitat types Cost of land acquisition (e.g. Fee tiles, conservation easement, lease) Timing of availability relative to the need for implementing restoration measures Relative cost of implementing and maintaining habitat created/ restored habitat
Conservation Area Design Concepts: 1.
Habitat will be created/ restored in patches within the optimal range of patch sizes required to support sustainable occupancy of the target-covered species.
2.
MSCP conservation areas will be designated to create an integrated mosaic of vegetation to approximate the historical juxtaposition of communities along the LCR. Exs: approximating the historical floodplain community or Restoring habitat in locations where habitat mosaics are created or enhanced 3.
Created/ restored habitat for species with limited distribution along the LCR and with limited ability to move among habitat patches along the LCR will be located near known populations to facilitate future occupancy of restored habitats 4.
To create large patches of habitat that will be more likely to support high numbers of associated covered habitats, priority will be given to restoring habitat near existing habitat 5.
To the extent consistent with the conservation area site selection criteria, preference will be accorded to locating created/ restored habitat on federal, state, 
If suitable public lands are not available, public lands will be considered on the principle of willing sellor or lessor.
6.
Management of conservation areas includes a commitment to: - Reducing the risk of the loss of created/ restored habitat to wildfire by providing resources to suppress wildfires fires (e.g., contributing to and integrating with local, state, and federal agency fire management plans), - Designing conservation areas to contain wildfire and facilitate rapid response to suppress fires (e.g. fire management will be an element of each conservation area management plan - Implementing land management and habitat restoration measures in conservation areas to support the reestablishment of native vegetation that is lost to wildfire 7.
Conservation areas will, as needed, incorporate buffer areas to minimize the potential effects of wildlfire, existing land uses, and other activities that may be associated with adjacent lands that could adversely affect the ecological functions associated with the created/ restored habitats.
Conservation areas will be designed to minimize the need for buffers by locating, juxtaposing, and managing created/ restored habitats in a manner that will minimize the effect of activities that may occur on adjacent lands.
8.
Conservation areas will be located and designed to incorporate, to the greatest extent practicable, existing infrastructure and to minimize the need for construction of new infrastructure required for the establishment and management of habitats.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
49
Coachella Valley Multiple Species Habitat Conservation Plan, Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy and Coachella Valley Association of Governments (www.cvmshcp.org) The purpose and goals of plan are: - Address Federal Endangered Species Act and California Endangered Species Act issues proactively.
- Provide for the conservation of and secures incidental take permits for 27 species of plants and animals.
- Provide for the conservation of 27 natural communities.
- Conserve terrestrial and aquatic biodiversity resources - Protect watershed values as important ecological processes - Include a public access and recreation component - Protect natural open space in and around urban areas - Does not address working landscapes (grazing and timber aren't-issues; agriculture is generally unaffected) Proposed Northern and Eastern Colorado Desert Coordinated Management Plan and Final Environmental Impact Assessment, U.S. Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management (http://www.ca.blm.gov/cdd/landuseplanning.html) The Plan identifies the following Significant Management Issues and corresponding Goals and Objectives: Standards and guidelines - Establish standards for managing ecosystem health and guidelines for managing domestic livestock uses Recovery of the Desert Tortoise - Recover tortoise populations in two recovery units; criteria for recovery are summarized as: Upward or stationary population trend for at least 25 years Maintain sufficient habitat to ensure long-term population viability (640,000 acres/ recovery unit) Recruitment rate equal to death rate Management of Special Status Animals and Plants and Natural Communities Big Horn Sheep - Maintain genetic variation by conserving and enhancing subpopulations, by increasing usable habitat, augmenting or re-establish populations (by transplanting), and maintaining habitat connectivity between subpopulations - Identify, protect, and restore essential habitat (providing forage, water, cover, space and movement corridors necessary to maintain viable populations) Desert Mule Deer (not a special status species, but a game species for which artificial waters are proposed) - Provide for the aesthetic, educational and recreational uses of desert mule deer by maintaining genetic variation and viability of subpopulations, by increasing usable habitat and by augmenting populations Other Special Status Animals and Plants and Natural Communities Plants and Animals - Maintain the naturally occurring distribution of 28 special status animal species and 30 special status plant species in the planning area Natural Communities - Maintain proper functioning condition in all natural communities with special emphasis on communities a) present in small quantity, b) with high species richness, or c) that support many special status species Ecological Processes - Maintain naturally occurring interrelationships among various biotic and abiotic elements of the environment - Protect and enhance habitat and connectivity between protected communities Wild Horses and Burros - Manage wild burro herds for healthy viable populations in thriving natural ecological balance - Manage current range boundaries, eliminate some range, add some historic range - For herds and management units common to California and Arizona administrations resolve management issues, improve program administration Motorized-Vehicle Access, Routes of Travel Designation, and Recreation - Provide for constrained motorized vehicle access in a manner that balances the needs of all desert users, private landowners, and other public agencies - When designating or amending routes, avoid adverse impacts to desert resources to the extent possible
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
50
- -
Emphasize use of public information (maps, signs and published information to communicate the motorized vehicle access situation and to increase public awareness, appreciation and sensitivity to desert resources Provide for a wide range of recreation opportunities, emphasizing dispersed undeveloped use
Land Ownership Patterns - Adjust land ownership patterns though acquisition and disposal of selected lands to: 1) improve opportunities for management and conservation within Desert Wilderness Management Areas and Wildlife Habitat Management Areas and existing wilderness and 2) to facilitate the use of public and private land in areas of low natural resources values for private, commercial or social purposes, including opportunity of community expansion Access to Resources for Economic and Social Needs - Provide a minimum of recreation facilities, encourage use by special populations - Manage recreation use to minimize user conflicts: provide safe recreation environment and protect desert resources - Use Congressional and protective land designation to develop areas of conservation emphasis for Desert Tortoise and other species' habitats that will minimize needs for additional areas for this purpose - Develop management emphases commensurate with issues contained - Manage species and habitats by increasing cost of doing business as opposed to imposing additional restrictions - Decision-based on science-based judgment, regional and long-term perspectives and cooperative approaches Additionally, the Plan includes an Appendix to convey considerations and guidelines developed by the Desert Restoration Task Force Site Planning and Restoration considerations may include: 1.
Special status species - Listed, proposed, sensitive - Species-habitat relationships that apply 2.
Plant Community - Common, rare - Site quality 3.
Management goals 4.
Ecological Processes - Determine pre-existing condition, distribution of species and habitats - Most important to restore and that humans can effect - Commonly considered are soil, hydrologic, wind functions, movement of animals, sources and movement of seeds 5.
Conservation Principles - Patch size (fragmentation) - Corridors - Habitat conversion to exotic species 6.
Site context - Site in area of habitat - Site in range(s) of species, etc. 7.
Site Analysis/Pre-existing site condition ­ constraints and objectives - Topography, slope, aspect - Landforms - Vegetation, etc. 8.
Constraints - Can approximate original topography be achieved? - Historic use patterns - Are there uses that could impair restoration efforts? - Time - Cost, etc. 9.
Common applications - Exotic plant control - Maintenance measures - Erosion control - Seeding, etc. 10.
Monitoring Program Success Criteria - Success Criteria 11.
Cover stories
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
51
Draft Environmental Impact Report and Statement for the West Mojave Plan, A Habitat Conservation Plan and California Desert Conservation Area Plan Amendment, U.S. Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management (http://www.ca.blm.gov/cdd/landuseplanning.html) The Plan identifies the following Planning Issues and corresponding intentions: Desert Tortoise and Mojave Ground Squirrel: - Identify conservation areas and adopt conservation strategies that minimize take on private land and recover populations on public land.
Other Listed and Sensitive Species: - Adopt conservation strategies that minimize take on private land, recover populations on public land, and prevent future listings of unlisted species.
Streamline Endangered Species Act Compliance - Develop a process that would allow applicants for city, county, state and federal permits and authorization to accelerate existing costly and time-consuming permit issuance procedures.
Motorized Vehicle Access Network for Public Lands - Provide appropriate access to public lands for commercial, recreational and other purposes in a manner that is compatible with species conservation.
Expansion of Fort Irwin - Develop conservation strategies that will be effective even if expanded military training programs are implemented on lands transferred in 2001 to Fort Irwin.
Standards and Guidelines for Public Lands - Develop rangeland standards for managing ecosystem health and guidelines for managing domestic livestock uses.
Regional Economic Growth - Promote economic growth within the planning area.
The Plan documents seven alternative strategies to conserve over 100 sensitive plants and animals and their habitats found within western Mojave Desert, while streamlining procedures for complying with Federal and California Endangered Species Acts.
Management Prescriptions are described for each alternative, and each prescription is designated as being applicable to one or more of the following resources/ objectives: - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
Adaptive Management Birds Bats Desert Tortoise Education Habitat Conservation Area Livestock Grazing Monitoring Mammals Mojave Ground Squirrel Mojave River Motorized Vehicles Plants Reptiles Raptors
Biological goals have been developed for each species addressed by the West Mojave Plan in accordance with habitat conservation plan requirements established by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service.
The Plan identifies the following measurable biological goals: - -
Protect sufficient habitat to ensure long-term Desert tortoise population viability.
Establish an upward or stationary trend in the Desert tortoise population of the West Mojave Recovery Unit for at least 25 years.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
52
- -
Ensure genetic connectivity among Desert tortoise populations.
Reduce Tortoise mortality from interspecific (raven predation) and intraspecifc (disease) conflicts that likely result for human induced changes in ecosystem processes.
Maintain and enhance viability of all Bighorn sheep and bat (all species) populations in the planning area.
Ensure long-term protection and viability of Mojave ground squirrel habitat throughout its range.
Preserve the complete blows and ecosystem at eight of the fourteen occupied habitats, thereby protecting Mojave fringe-toed lizard.
Conserve all remaining riparian and wetland habitat, thereby protecting Mojave River vole.
Maintain and enhance existing habitat for Panamint alligator lizard and Yellow eared pocket mouse.
Conserve two large representative areas, Big Rock Creek and Mescal Creek, with connectivity of the overall range through the National Forests, to ensure protection of San Diego horned lizard.
Conserve all remaining populations of Southwestern pond turtle on the Mojave River, Lake Elizabeth and Amargosa Creek.
Maintain hydrological processes that support the dense populations of Alkali mariposa lily within Rosamond Lake Basin, and conserve outlying sites representative of alkali spring, meadow and seep habitats.
Protect viable unfragmented habitat for Barstow woolly sunflower and Lane Mountain Milk Vetch on public lands throughout limited ranges.
Preserve the wash and sand field habitat of the disjunct population of White-margined beardtongue.
Conserve two major unfragmented populations on Bureau of Land Management lands contiguous with populations on Forest Service lands for five plant species found in carbonate habitats.
Maintain and enhance existing occurrences and habitat of Charlotte's phacelia.
Preserve disjunct populations of Crucifixion thorn on public land and protect the Crucifixion thorn community.
Avoid take of Desert cymopterus while researching habitat and species requirements.
Maintain extant populations of Flax-like monardella and Reveal's buckwheat.
Protect all occurrences and potential habitat on public lands of Kelso Creek monkeyflower.
Protect all known occurrences of Kern buckwheat.
Protect all occurrences of Little San Bernadino Mountains gilia on public lands and 90% of known populations on private land; protect drainages and fluvial processes that maintain gilia populations.
Protect viable populations of Mojave monkey flower on public land throughout its range.
Protect viable populations of Mojave tarplant on public lands (these populations may be disjunct).
Preserve large intact populations of Parish's phacelia on publicly owned dry lakebeds and conserve a public land corridor connecting the dry lakes.
Conserve the single private land location of Parish's alkali grass, Parish's popcorn flower, and Salt Springs Checkerbloom; survey other alkaline springs and seeps to look for other populations.
Conserve two large representative populations of Short-joint beavertail cactus that are contiguous with National Forest lands.
- - -
- - -
-
-
-
- -
- - - - - - -
- - -
-
-
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
53
- - -
Conserve and maintain all occurrences of Red Rock poppy and Red Rock tarplant in the El Paso mountains.
Protect known populations and habitat of Bendire's thrasher on public lands.
Prevent direct incidental take of Burrowing owls in urban areas, and establish reserves of occupied habitat for Burrowing owl.
Prevent electrocution of Ferruginous hawk.
Preserve all nest sites and maintain baseline number of occupied or nest territories for Golden eagle and Prairie falcon.
Conserve at least one core block of suitable nesting habitat for Gray vireo.
Protect a viable population of Inyo California towhee on public lands that, in conjunction with military conservation programs, will be enough to meet Recovery plan criteria for de-listing.
Conserve a large area capable of supporting LeConte's thrasher in perpetuity.
Preserve all nest sites and communal roosts of Long-eared owl.
Conserve all riparian habitat used for breeding and migratory stopovers by Southwestern willow flycatcher, all suitable riparian nesting habitat for Least Bell's vireo, Yellow warbler, and Yellow breasted chat, and all existing riparian habitat outside developed areas for Summer tanager and Vermillion flycatcher.
Preserve all nest sites and maintain and enhance nesting and wintering habitat on all public lands for Western Snowy plover.
Conserve all potential nesting and migratory stopover habitat for Western yellow-billed cuckoo.
- -
- -
- - -
-
-
Proposed Northern and Eastern Mojave Coordinated Management Plan and Final Environmental Impact Statement, U.S. Department of the Interior, Bureau of Land Management (http://www.ca.blm.gov/cdd/landuseplanning.htl) The Plan identifies the following Major Issues and corresponding Goals and Objectives: Public Land Health - Adopt Standards for public land health and guidelines for grazing management Threatened and Endangered and Special Status Species Protection Desert Tortoise - Establish Desert Tortoise Wildlife Management areas and adopt appropriate management within the boundaries, Designate Areas of Critical Environmental Concern - Assign appropriate Multiple Use Classes - Change grazing and burro management to recover the tortoise Amargosa Vole - Designate and Area of Critical Environmental Concern and adopt management strategies to facilitate recovery of the vole and enhance other Amargosa watershed values Threatened and Endangered Plants - Establish Carson Slough Area of Critical Environmental Concern and adopt management strategies to recover threatened and endangered plants Bats - Modify the Multiple-Use Class of the Silurian Hills to conserve sensitive bats Issues resulting from California Desert Protection Act - Make Multiple-use Class decisions for land released from wilderness consideration and make changes to California Desert Conservation Area Plan to conform to California Desert Protection Act Organized Competitive Vehicle Events - Adopt an off-highway vehicle strategy for motorized competitive speed events that protects sensitive areas and addresses fragmented racecourses
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
54
Designate Routes of Travel for Motor Vehicle Access - Designate routes in Desert Tortoise Desert Wildlife Management Areas - Identify process and priorities for route designation in rest of planning area Bureau Policy on elimination of landfills on public lands - Change Multiple Use Classes at existing landfills on public lands to allow waste disposal to occur Wild and Scenic Rivers - Identify portions of Amargosa River, Cottonwood Creek, Surprise Canyon Creek for potential inclusion in the National Wild and Scenic Rivers System - Outline the process/ additional steps for development of Wild and Scenic River recommendations to Congress
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
55
APPENDIX C WORKSHOP PARTICIPANTS Last Ms. Dr. Ms. Mr. Ms. Ms. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Ms. Mr. Ms. Mr. Mr. Ms. Mr. Ms. Mr. Allen Allen Anderson Baldinos Balfour Barber Beardslee Bell Bergeron Black Bolton Bransfield Brashear Brown Burgess Carson Cashore Clark Conden First Harriet Michael Ileene Terry Title Sierra Club Chair, Center for Conservation Biology Policy Analyst Affiliation Desert protective Council Address 3750 El Canto Drive City Phone/ Fax (619) 670-7127 (909) 787-5494 323/654-5943 760-786-3243 760-374-1306 760-257-3224 661-861-2191 jspear@mscomm.com mbeardslee@kerncog.org ds9plumb@charter.net 909-763-9793 dick@mountaincoalition.org gblack@dfg.ca.gov bolton@riversidecfb.com Ray_Bransfield@r1.fws.gov hmbrashear@eudoramail.co m dates@chinaranch.com jill_heaton@institute.redlands .edu info@theabf.org bcashore@yahoo.com aclark@qnet.com michael.allen@ucr.edu ieanderson@earthlink.net kat_eisenman@nps.gov Email Spring Valley, CA 91977 UC Riverside University Lab Building Riverside, CA, 92521 209, 900 University Avenue California Native Plant 2733 Cardwell Place Los Angeles, CA Society Native Plant Society 90046-1201 Death Valley National Park P.O. Box 579 Death Valley, CA 92328 Mines Exploration PO BOX 851 RED MOUNTAIN, CA 93558 Equestrian Trails 43774 COTTONWOOD NEWBERRY International ROAD SPRINGS, CA 92365 Kern Council of Governments 1401 19th Street, Suite Bakersfield, CA 300 93301 Mojave Desert Resource Conservation Service Mountain Coalition Group PO BOX 193 42455 Wildwood Lane 4775 Bird Farm Road Lucerne Valley, CA 92356-0193 Aguanga, Ca 92536
Interpretive Branch Chief Margio Mae Liaison Pamalla
Marilyn Chuck Dick Glenn Sharon Ray Marie Brian Paul Linda Brian Andrea L. Paul
Senior Transportation Planner Director President
21160 Box Springs Rd. Suite 102 2493 Portola Rd, Suite B Vice President of Society for the Protection and 10500 CHRISTENSON Special Projects Care of Wildlife RD Natural Resource Shoshone Museum China Ranch Date Advocate Farm P.O. Box 61 University of Redlands 1200 E. Colton Ave, Duke Hall, 211 Executive Director Anza-Borrego Foundation P.O. Box 2001 Inyo County Water Department Inyo County
Senior California Department of Fish Environmental and Game Scientist Executive Director Riverside County Farm Bureau Wildlife Biologist US Fish and Wildlife Service
Chino Hills, CA 91709 909-597-5043 Moreno Valley, CA 92557 Ventura, CA 93003 909-684-6732 805-644-1766
LUCERNE VALLEY, 760-248-6583 CA 92356-8335 Shoshone, CA 92384 760-852-4403 Redlands, CA 92373- 909-335-5383 0999 Borrego Springs, CA 760-767-0446 92004 (760 ) 872-1168 Independence, CA 93526 Johannesburg, CA 93528 (760) 878-0028 760-374-2242
Senior Planner
P.O. Drawer L PO BOX 53
Land Use Planner Inyo County
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
56
Last Mr. Ms. Mr. Mr. Mr. Crowe Cuff Dodson Evanko Everly
First Dick Courtney Jim Steven Clarence
Title Resource Management Specialist Pacific Regional Director
Affiliation BLM - Desert district National Parks Conservation Association California Desert Protection League USMC Environmental Coordination Office Desert Managers Group/Program Manager Mojave Desert Ecosystem Program California Association of 4 Wheel Drive Clubs UCNRS - Deep Canyon California Wilderness Coalition Mojave Desert State Parks
Address 6221 Box Springs Blvd.
Riverside, CA 92507 P.O. Box 1289 43904 GALION AVE USMC Box 555246, Bldg 1164 222 East Main Street, Suite 215 9835 Duncan Rd. P.O. Box 1738 6427 -F Mesquite Ave.
City
Phone/ Fax
Email
(909) 697 - 5216 rcrowe@ca.blm.gov Oakland, CA 946041289 LANCASTER, CA 93536-5824 Camp Pendleton, CA 92055 Barstow, CA. 92311 510-839-9922 661-942-3662 (760) 725-2635 760-255-8896 ccuff@npca.org jldodson@prodigy.net evankosp@pendleton.usmc. mil everlyc@mojavedata.gov
Representative for General Bice DoD Coordinator
Ms. Mr. Ms.
Ferguson Fisher Flanagan
Jeri Mark Pat Kathleen Bill Leonard John Bill Buck Yvonne Jerry Paul Jennifer Richard Deep Canyon Desert Research Center Desert Representative Superintendent
Victorville, CA 92392 760-956-2783 Palm Desert, CA 92261 29 Palms, CA 92277 (760) 341-3655 760-361-5430
jeriferg@aol.com sandlizards@mindspring.co m paflanagan@earthlink.net kfranklin@parks.ca.gov whaigh@ca.blm.gov
Superi Franklin ntende nt Mr. Haigh Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Ms. Mr. Mr. Ms. Mr. Hale Hamil Havert Hemenway Hestor Hillier Hogan Hranilovich Inman
43779 15th Street, west Lancaster, CA 93534 661-942-0662 22835 Calle San Juan De Los Lagos 47981 Doe Canyon Road 222 E MAIN STREET SUITE 202 45480 Portola 7621 Granite Hill Dr. Moreno Valley, CA 92553 Hemet, CA 92544 BARSTOW, CA 92311 Palm Desert, CA 92260 Riverside, CA 92509 909-927-2163 760-255-8888 760-790-3405 909-685-5818
Project Manager - Bureau of Land West Mojave Plan Management, California Desert District Office Associate Range Management Advisory Committee Desert Department of the Interior Management Council Executive Director Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy Project Director Jurupa Mountains Cultural Center Public Information City of Victorville Officer Quad State Coalition General Manager Inland Empire West Resource Conservation District Regional Trust for Public Land Coordinator University of Redlands
John_Hamill@dmg.gov billh@pe.net buck@the-jmcc.org
PO Box 480
San Bernardino, CA 92402 1609 South Grove Ave.
Ontario, CA 91761 Suite 103 3250 Wilshire Blvd, Los Angeles, CA Suite 2003 90010 Univ. of Redlands 1200 Redlands, CA 92373 E. Colton Ave., Duke Hall
909-683-5725 909-930-2779 (213) 380-4233 909-335-5268
ghillier@hotmail.com iewrcd.iewrcd@verizon.net jennifer.hranilovich@tpl.org tim_krantz@redlands.edu
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
57
Last Mr. Ms. Mr. Ms. Mr. Mr. Mr. Dr. Ms. Ms. Ms. Mr. Mr. Ms. Dr. Mr. Ms. Ms. Mr. Ms. Jackson Jacques Joia Jones Kibbey Kiriokas Krause LaPre Lee Lile McKean Mendoza Monroy Moore Muth Nichols Otero Page Patterson Pelizza
First James Sonia Manuel Rebecca Edward Peter Phil Larry Martha Laurie Debbie Ramon Miguel Tonya Alan Pete Linda Valerie Daniel Sylvia
Title Director of Environmental Affairs
Affiliation IMC CHEMICALS Trust for Public Land
Address PO BOX 307 116 New Montgomery, 3rd Floor Box 110570 36431 41st Str.
East 77564 Country Club Drive ste.400B 29421 Sun Harbor Court 777 E. Rialto Avenue 22835 Calle San Juan De Los Lagos PO BOX 844
City TRONA, CA 93592 San Francisco, CA 94105 Barstow, CA 923115013 Palmdale, CA 93552 Palm Desert, CA 92211 Lake Elsinore, CA 92530 San Bernardino, CA 92415-0763 Moreno Valley, CA 92553 Yosemite NP, CA 95389
Phone/ Fax 760-372-2042 (415) 4955660x390 760-577-6111 661-285-5867 760-360-2476 909-245-2304 909-387-2588 (909) 697-5218 209-379-1221 661-267-5200 909-930-2779
Email Jacksonj@imcchemicals.com sonia.jacques@tpl.org joiam@barstow.usmc.mil dfgpalm@mindspring.com ed.kibbey@desertchapter.co m p.kiriakos@verizon.net pkrause@parks.sbcounty.go v llapre@ca.blm.gov martha_lee@nps.gov llile@cityofpalmdale.org
California Department of Fish and Game Executive Director Building Industry Association/ Desert Chapter Conservation Sierra Club-San Gorgonio Chair Recreation San Bernardino County Planner Regional Parks Biologist, West Bureau of Land Mojave Plan Management, California Desert District Office Executive Yosemite National Park Leadership Program Director of City of Palmdale Planning Inland Empire West Resource Conservation District Desert Environmental Response Team Assistant Imperial County Agricultural Commissioner Environmental CALTRANS Planner Deep Canyon University of California Desert Research Riverside Center Regional Wildlands Project, California conservation Wilderness Coalition Assoc.
Tribal Ft. Mojave Representative Mojave Desert Resource Conservation District Desert Ecologist Center for Biological Diversity Refuge Manager
Environmental Officer Wildlife Biologist
US Marine Corps.
-Barstow
38250 SIERRA PALMDALE, CA HIGHWAY 93550-4731 1609 South Grove Ave.
Ontario, CA 91761 Suite 103
58692 LOS COYOTES YUCCA VALLEY, CA 760-228-2792 DR 92284-5530 150 South Ninth Street El Centro, 92243760-482-4314 2801 464 W. Fourth ST. P.O. Box 1738 P.O. Box 342 San Bernardino, CA 92407 Palm Desert, CA 92261 Grass Valley CA 95945 909-383-6934 760-341-3655 530-271-5945
rloneeagle@earthlink.net miguelmonroy@imperialcoun ty.net tonya_moore@dot.ca.gov deepcanyon@mindspring.co m pnichols@calwild.org
13954 Osage Road P.O. Box 493
Apple Valley, CA 92307 Idyllwild, CA 92549 Calipatria, CA 92233
760-843-6882 x101 909-659-2290 760-348-5278
valerie.page@ca.usda.gov 
US Fish and Wildlife Service, 906 W. Sinclair Rd Salton Sea Wildlife refuge
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
58
Last Mr. Mr. Ms. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Ms Mr. Mr. Ms. Ms. Ms. Peterson Phillips Pickel Porter Reno Rister Sauer Schiller Scott Scott Skoefield Smith Soens Soria Stewart Stewart Strub Sullivan Taylor Thomas Thornburg
First Craig Eddie Jenni James Dave Randy Curt Ron Gary Brad Russell Steve Harold Rhody Jack Allison L. Robert James E. Joan Donna Leslie
Title
Affiliation
Address 400 N. China Lake Blvd. 1482 E. Enterprise Dr.
City
Phone/ Fax
Email
Regional Planner Eastern Kern Resource Conservation District Tribal Chairman San Manuel Band of Serrano Mission Indians Local Assistance Department of Conservation Program Land California State Lands Management Commission Specialist Regional Planner Hesperia - Planning Director, County Imperial County Property Services Acting Joshua Tree National Superintendent Park/Olympic NP High Desert Multiple Use Coalition Founding Director Fire Safe Council Vice President West Mojave Conservation Plan Recreation Branch Chief District 38 Conservation Supervisor City Manager District Ranger President Director of Environmental Resources Riverside County Farm Bureau Bureau of Land Management
Ridgecrest, CA 93555 760-384-5835 San Bernardino, CA 92408-0161 ephillips@sanmanuel.com
100 Howe Avenue, Ste Sacramento, CA 100 S 95825-8202 HESPERIA, CA 92345-3454 150 South Ninth Street El Centro, 922432801 74485 National Park Dr. Twenty-Nine Palms, CA 92277 1156 N THORN ST RIDGECREST, CA 93555-7980 PO Box 8 Mountain Center, CA 92561 18051 Gilman Springs Moreno, CA 92555 rd. 15776 MAIN ST
916-574-1940 760-947-1253 760-482-4314 760-367-5502 760-377-5053 909-659-7035 909-208-0313 760-365-0955
lynchr@slc.ca.gov dreno@ci.hesperia.ca.us miguelmonroy@imperialcoun ty.net david_denslow@nps.gov schiller@ridgenet.net gary@sbn.cc scotts.ef@pe.net
Bureau of Land Management 300 So.
Richmond Rd.
American Motorcycle Association CCC Coachella Satellite California City Mt. Top District - San Bernardino NF Valley Sand and Gravel 9536 Rawlins Way PO BOX 901 21000 Hacienda Blvd PO BOX 350 PO BOX 36
Ridgecrest, CA 93555 Santee CA 92071 Patton, CA 92369
760-384-5405 (619) 449-9648 909-862-3600 hsoens@worldnet.att.net rhodys@ccc.ca.gov city1@ccis.com astewart01@fs.fed.us bobstrub@hotmail.com jsullivan@cvag.org palmcanyon@msn.com awyatt@ridgetnet.net vterella@cadizinc.com
CALIFORNIA CITY, (760) 373-8661 CA 93505 Skyforest, CA 92385 909/337-2444 TRONA, CA 935920036 Palm Desert, CA 92260 Palm Springs, Ca 92264 Inyokern, 93527 Santa Monica, CA 90401 760-372-4944 760-346-1127 X117 760-778-1101 760-377-4525 310-899-4725
Coachella Valley Association 73710 Fred Waring of Governments Drive, Suite 200 Friends of Indian Canyons 1800 S. Sunrise 8158 Panorama Trail 100 Wilshire Blvd., Ste 1600
Board Member Manager, Ranch Operations and Outreach
CA Assoc. of Resource Conservation Districts Cadiz Inc.
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
59
Last Ms. Ms. Mr. Mr. Mr. Ms. Ms. Mr. Ms. Mr. Mr. Mr. Mr. Ms. Mr. Thorpe Trost Trowsdale Tynberg Van Cleve Veale Wagenvord Weber Weiner Wellman Whinery Widell Wilson Wold Worthley
First Claire Roxie Larry Alex Dave Barbara Helen Thomas Terry Bud Mathew Dave Jim Terry Fred
Title
Affiliation
Address
City San Francisco, CA 94105 Barstow, CA 92311 TRONA, CA 93592 San Francisco, CA 94105 Borrego Springs, CA 92004 LUCERNE VALLEY, CA 92356 Oakland, CA 94612
Phone/ Fax (415) 778-0999 Ext.223 760-252-6020 760-372-2042 (415) 495-5660 760-767-4037 760-248-7208 510-272-9989
Email Thorp@nfwf.org rtrost@ca.blm.gov Trowsdal@imcchemicals.co m alex.tynberg@tpl.org dvanc@parks.ca.gov bveale@lucernevalley.net helen@wildspaces.net
Associate Director National Fish and Wildlife 28 Second Street 6th of Programs Foundation Floor Resource Chief Bureau of Land Management 2601 Barstow Rd. Environmental Manager IMC CHEMICALS Trust for Public Land Superintendent California State Parks, Colorado Desert District People for the USA PO BOX 307 116 New Montgomery, 3rd Floor 200 Palm Canyon Dr. 32566 SAPPHIRE RD 1212 Broadway, suite 701 P.O. Box 1870 3606 Front Street, REAR PO Box 4 385 North Arrowhead Avenue, First Floor PO BOX 942896 2330 E AVE J-8 SPACE 111 4077 Mission Inn Ave. 770 Fairmont Avenue, Ste 100
Program Director Wild Spaces General Manager Borrego Springs Water District Conservation Desert protective Council Coordinator Associate California Cattleman's' Association Regional Planner San Bernardino County, Land Use Services Department Deputy Director - California State Parks OHV Program Lost coyotes, American Motorcycle District 37 Association Regional The Wilderness Society Conservation Representative MSCP Colorado River Board of Administrator California
Borrego Springs, CA 760-767-5806 92004 San Diego, CA 92103 (619) 543-0757 Mountain Center, CA 909-961-1353 92561 San Bernardino, CA (909) 387-4168 92415 Sacramento, CA 916-324-5801 94296-0001 LANCASTER, CA 661-951-7078 93535 Riverside, CA. 92501 909-781-0938 Glendale, CA 91203- 818-543-4676 1035
jtdesert@ixpres.com
mwhinery@lusd.sbcounty.go v dwide@parks.ca.gov jiwil@webtv.net twold@tws.org crb@crb.ca.gov
PROCEEDINGS OF DESERT REGION SPOTLIGHT ON CONSERVATION WORKSHOP
60
